STATUS 

MaconiansAlbaniarks Roma VlacSerbs ks others
Total  men women Central government Civil servants financed from the Budget pursuant to the Law on Civil Servants 9283647161
10352
49415411Civil servants pursuant to other laws and public servants financed from the Budget 463289457831345224987152592
58916
3397924937TOTAL CIVIL AND PUBLIC SERVANTS 55611101049123713041148175643
69268
3892030348 (%) 80,28 14,59 1,32 0,54 0,44 1,66 0,25 0,93  100,00
56,1943,81Public servants in non-budgetary institutions 224791475240195135467318
25355
671518640TOTAL CENTRAL GOVERNMENT 780901157911525664391615221961
94623
4563548988(%) 82,5312,241,220,600,461,710,231,02
100,00
48,2351,77
Municipal administration TOTAL MUNICIPAL ADMINISTRATION 11172121400738662(%) 79,7915,141,790,790,431,500,140,43100,0052,7147,29TOTAL 79207 11791 1177 577 445 1636 223 967 96023 46373 49650 TOTAL (%) 82,49 12,28 1,23 0,60 0,46 1,70 0,23 1,01 100,00 48,29 51,71 Source: F1 and F2 Bases of the Ministry of Finance, data from the Health Fund (pertaining to the Fund and to health workers), Pension and Disability Insurance Fund of Macedonia (PDIFM), Roads Fund, Employment Agency, Privatisation Agency, Entrepreneurship Promotion Agency; Securities Commission, National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia and 124 municipalities. Status: 31.12.2004 Source: Civil Servants Agency 7. Is there a transparent legal or regulatory basis for actions taken by public servants? In particular, how is impartiality and non-discrimination of actions by public servants ensured? In the Republic of Macedonia there is a transparent legal basis for the impartial and non-discriminatory actions of the civil servants. The guarantees therefore are provided in the Constitution, the laws governing the administration and the administrative procedure, as well as in specific laws regulating separate areas.  The legal system of the Republic of Macedonia is based on the principles of constitutionality and legality, stated by Article 51 of the Constitution: Laws shall be in accordance with the Constitution and all other regulations shall be in accordance with the Constitution and the laws.  The Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies  (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), Article 3 stipulates that state administrative bodies perform their competencies defined by law based on the principles of legality, responsibility, efficiency, cost-efficiency, transparency, equality  and predictability. Additionally, Article 4 of the same law stipulates the obligation of the state administrative bodies to provide to the citizens efficient and lawful exercise of their freedoms and rights guaranteed by the Constitution. It is also stipulated that within their competence the state administrative bodies provide efficient and lawful implementation of the rights and interests of all the parties in the administrative procedure. Each individual decision of a public body must be founded on a Law or a regulation based on law (for more details see I_C_9). Furthermore, the existing laws and regulations that regulate the status, the rights and the duties of the civil servants and the other public employees, envisage the obligation of impartiality and non-discrimination when undertaking legal actions, especially when deciding on concrete rights and interests of the citizens and other legal persons in administrative procedures. Such laws are the Law on Civil Servants, the Law on Internal Affairs, the Law on Customs Administration and other regulations (for more details see I_C_6). The Law on Civil Servants (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04), provides that the civil servants must perform their duties conscientiously, professionally, efficiently, orderly and timely, in accordance with the Constitution and law. Furthermore, the civil servant is obliged to perform his/her activities impartially and without the influence of political parties; he/she may not be guided by his/her own political beliefs or personal financial interests; and he/she must refrain from misuse of authorisations and the status of a civil servant and protect the reputation of the body. The civil servant is, in accordance with law, obliged to provide information upon request of the citizens required for exercise of their rights and interests, except the information classified as state or official secret. The Code of Ethics for Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 96/01 and 16/04), determines the manner of civil servants’ behaviour and conduct in order to secure the respect of principles of legality, professional integrity, efficiency, and loyalty during the execution of their official duties.  The Law on Internal Affairs ("Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia", Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), and relevant bylaws specify that the employees of the Ministry of Internal Affairs have to respect the personality, dignity, rights and freedom of citizens, regardless of their gender or ethnic, religious, political affiliation and social status.   The Law on Customs Administration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), explicitly stipulates that the Customs Administration and the customs officers shall not discriminate against any person on any ground, such as: gender, race, skin colour, ethnic or social origin, political and religious affiliation, property and social status or other status.  The Codes of Ethics which are adopted for specific categories of civil servants (the Ethical Code for Civil Servants, the Police Code of Ethics, etc.) additionally regulate the principles of equal treatment, i.e. non-discrimination, and impartiality in the work of the civil servants. If these regulations are violated a procedure for evaluation of the accountability, and responsibility of the civil servants is undertaken, which does not exclude the possibility of being prosecuted for specific actions under the Law on Criminal Procedure, or being prosecuted with a misdemeanour procedure before competent body (for more details see I_C_6). In accordance with the Law on Administrative Inspection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/04), the National Inspectorate for Administration (body within the Ministry of Justice), conducts supervision of the application of the procedural rules and especially over the conduct and activities of the civil servants, with the aim to secure respect of the principles of legality, professional integrity, efficiency, accountability, and responsibility.  The provisions of the Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04 - consolidated text), sanction unlawful behaviour, which is crucial for gaining public confidence in the impartial and non-discriminatory work of the employees in the public sector.  The Draft Law on Free Access to Public Information, which is in parliamentary procedure aims towards improving the guarantees for access to public information available to the state administration, the local self-government bodies, the public institutions and services, as well as the other legal and natural persons vested with public authority. Furthermore, the Constitution guarantees two instances in administrative procedures, i.e. the right to appeal against individual legal acts passed in procedure in the first instance courts, administrative bodies or organisations, or other institutions that perform public mandate (for more details see I_C_9). The institution of the Ombudsman provides additional protection from partial and discriminatory behaviour of civil servants (for more details see I_G_6). 8. How is accountability of administrative bodies ensured (e.g. are administrative bodies accountable or answerable for their actions to other administrative, legislative or judicial authorities, and subject to scrutiny by others)? 
Parliamentary scrutiny  According to the Constitution (Article 68), the Assembly carries out political control and supervision of the Government and other holders of public office accountable to the Assembly.  The Assembly controls the Government by Parliamentary questions, inquiry committees, interpellation motions and a confidence vote. The Assembly also controls the work of the Government and the state administration through its committees as well as by the mechanism of reporting of certain public bodies, established in specific laws  (for more details see I_B_2).  Supervision by the Government over state administration and bodies of local self-government units   The accountability of the state administrative bodies to the other state bodies has been in detail elaborated in Section III of the Law, which governs the administrative supervision and the inspection.  The supervision over the work of the state administrative bodies includes the supervision over the legality and over the efficiency in their operation. Supervision is conducted over public enterprises, public services and institutions, as well as over natural persons and legal entities vested with public authority by law. The operation of the ministries is supervised by the Government. Supervision over the operation of bodies within ministries is performed by the respective ministries, while the operation of other state administrative bodies and state administrative organisations is supervised by the ministry competent for the administrative matters for which the relevant body has been established.  According to the Law on the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00 and 12/03), the Government determines guidelines and positions on the enforcement of laws and other regulations. The guidelines and positions regulate the operation of ministries, other state administrative bodies and administrative organisations in their enforcement of laws and other regulations. In addition, the Government determines deadlines by which the authorised bodies have to adopt acts and submit reports on specific issues. It also determines the modes of cooperation with other state administrative bodies as well as other issues relevant for the realisation of these bodies' functions. The Government may instruct a minister i.e. director of another state administrative body or administrative organisation, on how he/she is to implement the Government's guidelines or positions. If the Government deems that a particular regulation passed by a minister is not in compliance with the Constitution, laws or other regulations, it will notify the minister. Furthermore, the Government may suspend a regulation passed by a minister if it deems the regulation is not in compliance with the Constitution, laws or other regulations and may propose the minister to withdraw or alter the regulation within a certain period of time. The Government within its supervision competences may abolish or annul a regulation or another act passed by the ministries, state administrative bodies and administrative organisations if it is not in compliance with the Constitution, laws or other regulations passed by the Assembly or the Government.  The Government supervises the operation of the ministries, other state administrative bodies and administrative organisations. In carrying out its supervision over the operation of the state administrative bodies, the Government is entitled and obliged to abolish or annul a regulation or other act of a ministry, state administrative body or administrative organisation which does not comply with the Constitution, an Assembly’s law or other regulation, i.e. a Government’s regulation.  The Government is entitled to abolish or annul a regulation or another act passed by the council or another body of a local self-government unit or the City of Skopje as part of their delegated competences. Pursuant to the Law on Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/02), the supervision over the operation of municipal bodies includes the supervision over the legality in their operation and control and audit of their material and financial operation. Supervision over the operation of municipal bodies when they carry out delegated duties which are within the competences of state administrative bodies include supervision over legality and supervision over efficiency. Legality of municipal regulations is supervised by the ministry competent for the local self-government issues. Legality of the municipal bodies’ operation is conducted by the competent state administrative bodies. Audit of the municipal material and financial operations is conducted by the State Audit Office. Supervision over the delegated municipal authorities is conducted by the state administrative body competent for the delegated competencies. Inspection Inspection includes supervision over the enforcement of laws and other regulations by state bodies, public enterprises, companies, public institutions, natural persons and legal entities and it is conducted only by the state administrative bodies (inspectorates) within the competences defined by law.  Particular provisions on accountability are provided in the Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, 47/86 -consolidated text and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 44/02), concerning responsibility of first instance bodies before the second instance bodies. Thus, exercising the right of supervision and under legally prescribed conditions, upon a submitted legal remedy (complaint, appeal) the superior state administrative bodies have the right to annul an act, fully or partially, or abolish it, or change it. If no superior body exists, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia is authorised to conduct the supervision. Pursuant to the Law on Administrative Inspection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/04), the administrative inspection includes supervision over the application of the Law on General Administrative Procedure and other laws which include provisions on the administrative procedure. The inspection particularly refers to: timely, cost-effective and efficient exercise of rights and interests of citizens and other parties in the administrative procedure; acting within the prescribed deadlines in the first and second instance administrative procedure, as well as within the deadlines stipulated in the decisions of the judicial bodies; inclusion of concerned parties in the procedure in order to ensure protection of their rights and interests; ex officio provision of evidence from official records kept by the body conducting the procedure or by another state body, legal entity or person with public mandate, or by municipalities and the City of Skopje; enforcement of final legal acts; payment of costs in the administrative procedure; receipt of submissions; issuance of certificates and other documents from official records; professional training of civil servants and other employees who decide in the administrative procedure; delivery of administrative acts and other documents; mode of conduct of civil servants and employees in order to ensure respect of the principles of legality, professional integrity, efficiency, accountability and loyalty in carrying out their official duties; implementation of measures to improve the operation of administrative bodies when deciding in administrative matters; use of language by the parties in the administrative procedure and regulations pertaining to the office work. Judicial Protection  Article 50 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees a court protection of the legality of state administration’s individual decisions. The Law on Administrative Disputes (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 4/77, “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/02), in its Article 7 stipulates that an administrative dispute before the Supreme Court may be initiated against an administrative act adopted in second instance. Administrative dispute may also be initiated when the authorised body, following a request or a complaint by a party, has failed to adopt an appropriate administrative act. It may as well be initiated against an act upon which no right to a complaint has been provided in the administrative procedure and in instances when the administrative act has not been adopted under conditions prescribed by law. If following an annulment of an administrative act, and within 30 days at the latest, the authorised body fails to adopt another administrative act; the party may submit a request before court asking for the adoption of such act. Furthermore, the Law prescribes that in case the decision is not enforced within the period determined by the respective body, the court shall enforce it, either directly or through another court or a body.  Ombudsman The Ombudsman of the Republic of Macedonia is one of the controlling mechanisms over the operation of state administrative bodies. Such competences are stipulated by the Law on the Ombudsman (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03). Under its provisions, in cases when the Ombudsman has detected unlawful actions, inappropriate treatment of citizens or other irregularities, and with the purpose of exercise of citizens’ rights, he/she may give the state administrative bodies recommendations, proposals, opinions or directions to eliminate the detected violations. In the period from 1 January 2002 to 30 September 2004, the Ombudsman submitted 1319 recommendations, proposals, opinions or suggestions, proposing renewal of procedures in accordance with the law or initiation of a disciplinary procedure against officials/responsible civil servants. In the same period, the Ombudsman himself submitted one proposal for initiation of a disciplinary procedure. In the period from 1 January 2002 to 30 September 2004, the Ombudsman submitted six requests to the Public Prosecutor for initiation of procedure to determine criminal liability (data from the Ombudsman’s published reports and the Ombudsman’s archive records). Pursuant to Article 32 of the Law, if the administrative bodies fail to act upon a submitted request, proposal, opinion, recommendation or if they comply therewith only partially, the Ombudsman shall notify thereof the immediately superior authority, the head of the respective state administrative body or the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Pursuant to Article 34 and 35 of the Law, if the fail to act, the Ombudsman may bring out the case to the media (for more details see I_G_6
Protection of Constitutionality and Legality by the Constitutional Court  In accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Articles 108, 110, 112) performing its basic function of protecting constitutionality and legality, the Constitutional Court decides on the conformity of laws and of other regulations with the Constriction and the laws. The Constitutional Court shall annul or abrogate a law if it determines that it is not in conformity with the Constitution. It will furthermore annul or abrogate a regulation or another legal act if it determines that it does not conform to the Constitution and the laws.  Such position of the Constitutional Court provides additional control over the operation of the Government and the state administration as a whole – both as a proposers of laws and as a “creator” of secondary legislation.  9. What is done to ensure that the public service is open and transparent? Can any citizen affected by an administrative action find out the basis for the action? Transparency  Article 16 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees free access to information. This constitutional principle is further transposed in many laws which stipulate that the work of state administration and public bodies is public. Article 52 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia requires that all laws and other regulations be published in the “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” before entering into force.  Laws and regulations in the Republic of Macedonia provide guarantees for transparency during the drafting and the decision-making process (for more details see I_C_11), as well as in the actions of the public administration in the enforcement of laws and other regulations.   The Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), declares transparency as one of the principles of the operation of the state administration. Its provisions stipulate that state bodies inform the public about their work.   Article 70 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and the Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/02), the sittings of the Assembly and of its working bodies are open to the public. The Assembly may also decide to hold an open public discussion on a preliminary draft law, or hold a public hearing on a draft law.  According to the Law on the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00 and 12/03), the Government is obliged to inform the public of its work and the implementation of its Annual Work Programme. The Government will not publish information concerning the national security, official and business secrets, neither the personal data of the citizens according to the law that regulates protection of personal data. The Rules of Procedure of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/01, 98/02, 47/03, 64/03 and 67/03), define the modes of providing information about the work of the Government to the public and prescribes an obligation for the Members of the Government to inform the public about the work of the Government and the ministries. Furthermore, the Government has undertaken measures to enable closer communication with the public through strengthening the public relations units within the Government and the state administrative bodies and developing a communication strategy.     The Law on Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/02), obliges the bodies of the local self-government units to inform the citizens about their work, as well as about the plans and the programmes that are of importance for the development of the municipality. The municipality is obliged to provide the citizens access to the essential information about the services it provides, in a manner and under conditions that are determined by the Statute. Similarly to the obligation for publicising laws and regulations at the level of the state, the regulations of the municipality must be published before they enter into force in a mode determined by the Statute. According to Article 21 of the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04), the state employee is obliged, in accordance with the law, in a manner and under conditions determined by the law or other regulation, and upon request of citizens to provide information for fulfilment of their rights and interests, unless the information is a state or business secret.  Administrative Procedure  The principle of legality is the basic principle of the Law on General Administrative Procedure “Official Gazette of SFRY”, 47/86 -consolidated text and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 44/02). Additionally, it establishes the principles of efficiency, material truth, interrogation of the concerned party, evaluation of the evidence, independence in the decision making process, the right to appeal, effective decision, cost-effectiveness of the process, assistance to an ignorant concerned party, subsidiary implementation of the law, the usage of the languages and the alphabets, protection of the rights of the citizens and the protection of public interest. This law furthermore in detail defines the procedure (all its phases and elements, the rights of the Parties, conduct of procedure), legal remedies and enforcement in administrative matters. The Law is applied by state administrative bodies, other state bodies, public bodies vested with public authority, and municipal bodies. It comprises the principle of subsidiarity, which means that if a specific area administrative issues are regulated with a special law, the administrative body acts in accordance with the law.  In line with the principle of legality, the state administrative bodies decide on the basis of the law and other regulations. Each administrative case is decided by a body determined by law, in a procedure defined by law. The body which by a law or a by-law (based on a law) is authorised to deliver decisions upon discretionary assessment must deliver the decision within the limits of the given authority and in line with the aim of the authorisation (Article 4 of the Law). Furthermore, it is stipulated that the state administrative body conducts the administrative procedure and delivers a decision within the scope of authority defined by law or other regulations. The decision is issued by the head of the relevant body, if it is not otherwise regulated by specific regulations. The head may authorise an official (a civil servant) to conduct the administrative procedure in certain matters. The authorised official of the administrative body responsible for the relevant administrative procedure establishes the facts and the circumstances independently, applying the relevant laws and regulations to the specific case (Article 10 of the Law).  The decision in the administrative procedure is based on facts established upon evidence. In conducting the administrative procedure, the authorised official examines the concerned party’s request, gathers evidence and considers all relevant regulations. In the process of producing evidence, the official may: hold a hearing upon his/her initiative or on the initiative of the party whereby participation of concerned parties is granted and the hearing is officially recorded in minutes, request documents; summon witnesses; ask for a statement; request expertise; perform an on-site inspection, at which the Party may be present.  Every citizen who has submitted a request for the realisation of his/her rights to an administrative body, has a right throughout the administrative procedure to be informed which administrative actions are undertaken. He/she is also granted the right to examine all the documents contained in the file and copy the needed files in the presence of a given public official on his/her own expense. The right to review the materials is also guaranteed to another person who would prove his/her legal interest.  The Law prescribes in detail the content of the decision in administrative cases, thus providing the concerned Party with clear information of the basis, substance and arguments for the administrative decision. The decision consists of: introduction, disposition, explanation, instruction on legal remedy, title of the administrative body, number and date, signature of the responsible official and stamp of the administrative body. The introduction consists of: the title of the body delivering the decision, legal base of the competence of this body, name of the concerned party and its legal representative or a proxy (if any), and a short reference of the case. The disposition contains the substance of the decision – on the complete subject of the case, including all the requests of the Party. The explanation of the decision includes of: a summary of the requests of the party, the established factual situation and additionally, if necessary, the decisive arguments for each element of the decision. The explanation of the decision in simple matters and only including one party or a positive non-contested decision referring to more parties may be summarised and issued on a pre-prepared form. If the decision included discretionary assessment, this has to be specifically elaborated in the explanation, including a reference to the legal ground. The instruction on legal remedy consists of information on the body to which and the term within which the Party has the right to file a complaint.  Furthermore, the parties that live in a local self-government unit in which at least 20% of the population speaks an official language other than the Macedonian have the right to communicate with the local offices of the ministries in their language. For these local self-government units the local offices are obliged to respond in the language and alphabet used by the Party, in addition to Macedonian. Furthermore, in the administrative procedure these parties may submit documents in their language, while the bodies conducting the administrative procedure will translate them and act upon them. The bodies conducting the procedure, in deciding in administrative matters, respond to these parties in Macedonian and in the language used by the Party.  The decision in first instance must be delivered within two months form the lodging of the request if the administrative procedure entailed thorough examination, and one month if the procedure was simple.  If the decision is not issued in the prescribed term, the Party has the right to appeal, as if the request were refused.  The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 15) grants the right to appeal against individual decisions issued in first instance proceeding by a court, administrative body, organisation or other institution vested with public mandate. In Line with the Law on the Government  (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00 and 12/03), the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has established 14 second-instance commissions to act in administrative matters. According to the Law on the Government and its the Rules of Procedure, these commissions, in principle, have a chairperson, 4 members and their substitutes. A minister or a deputy minister may be appointed chairperson of the Commission, while the members are from the rank of managing and expert civil servants form the ministries, other state administrative bodies and the General Secretariat of the Government. Officials that take part in deciding in the respective administrative matters in first instance may not be appointed members of the second-instance commission.  If the second instance body in the time-period of sixty (60) days or less (in cases specific laws provide for a shorter term) does not deliver a decision, and fails to do so in additional seven days following an additional request of the Party, the Party may initiate an administrative dispute, as if the appeal were rejected (for more details see I_C_8). The official who is conducting the administrative procedure is responsible, if as a result of his/her fault  certain procedural actions in the procedure have not been completed. A new Draft-law on General Administrative Procedure is in parliamentary procedure.  10. What are the procedures for administrative control to guarantee citizens’ rights of recourse against public service actions? Describe these (e.g. parliamentary committees, ombudsman's office, internal and external audit, inspectorates, standard-setting authorities). The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 24) guarantees the citizens’ right to file petitions before, and receive responses from state bodies and other public services. At the same time, the Constitution provides that a citizen may not be held accountable nor suffer adverse consequences due to attitudes expressed in petitions, unless committing a criminal act.  Besides this general constitutional provision and in addition to the court protection (for more details see I_C_8), there are a number of institutes in the Republic of Macedonia, by which administrative control is ensured in order to guarantee the citizens’ right of recourse against actions of public services. For the protection of their rights against public services’ actions, citizens may address the following institutions: the Standing Inquiry Committee within the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, the Ombudsman, the State Administrative Inspectorate as a body within the Ministry of Justice, as well as other inspection bodies.  Standing Inquiry Committee for Protection of Citizen’s Rights and Freedoms The Committee is established by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, pursuant to the Constitution. The Committee, among others, explores issues pertaining to the implementation of Constitutional provisions, laws and other regulations and acts important for the exercise and protection of civil rights and freedoms. The Committee also considers submissions from citizens and decides on position upon them (for more details see I_B_2). A total of 74 petitions were submitted before the Committee in 2003, 30 of which were collective and 44 of which were individual petitions. Petitions referred to the following:  labour relations - 16, court matters - 14, administrative procedure - 10, social affairs - 6, police conduct - 5, urban planning - 4, matters pertaining to status in public or private enterprises - 4, displaced persons - 4, operation of state administration and local self-government - 4, public prosecution issues - 3 etc. Following the petitions, the Committee’s actions included: hearing of 47 petitioners, giving guidelines to 33 petitioners for the exercise of their rights and request of information from the competent bodies in 32 cases. In the period from January to September 2004, the Committee received a total of 83 petitions which were considered and upon which action was taken. After petitions by citizens or initiatives by Committee Members have been considered, and upon a previously provided information by the competent state administrative bodies or institutions, the Committee adopts appropriate conclusions requesting, recommending or pointing to respective bodies to bring their work in line with the legal rights of citizens. The Committee also has direct contacts with citizens or groups of citizens whose rights have been violated. In addition, the Committee reviews periodic or annual reports on the operation of bodies and institutions which deal with  the protection of constitutional and legal rights of citizens and adopts conclusions pointing to measures that are to be undertaken in order to provide for their more efficient exercise, while taking into account the competences of these bodies. The Committee cooperates with the Ombudsman, the State Administrative Inspectorate, the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption, the Judicial Council of the Republic, the Broadcasting Council, etc. The Committee’s findings represent a basis for the initiation of the procedure to determine public office-holders’ responsibility. Ombudsman of the Republic of Macedonia  The Office of the Ombudsman was established pursuant to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and the Law on the Ombudsman (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03). Citizens of the Republic of Macedonia and any other person may file petitions to the Ombudsman in cases when their rights, granted by Constitution and law have been violated by state administrative bodies, bodies and organisations with public mandates as well as public institutions and services. The procedure before the Ombudsman is regulated by the Law on the Ombudsman and the Ombudsman’s Rules of Procedure, under which the Ombudsman may also initiate procedures upon his/her own initiative. If in the petition or during the investigating procedure, violations of the constitutional and legal rights of the petitioner or of the person on whose behalf the procedure has been initiated are detected, the Ombudsman shall, in accordance with his/her legal competence, undertake measures to eliminate the illegal actions of the public administration and to ensure the exercise of the rights of the petitioner or of the person on whose behalf the procedure has been initiated. Concerning the operation of its Office and the degree to which human rights and freedoms have been respected, the Ombudsman submits an annual report to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. Over the past period, the Ombudsman has submitted six annual reports which have been publicly announced and made available to citizens, governmental and non-governmental organisations and international bodies and organisations. The Office of the Ombudsman in 2003 received 2605 petitions, which represented an increase of 38, 71% compared with the previous year.  The majority of petitions were in the following areas: judiciary – 415, labour relations – 406, property relations - 267, protection of rights in police procedure – 266, urban planning and civil engineering – 209, utility and other fees – 188, pension and disability insurance – 169, social affairs - 167, housing relations - 161, protection of children’s rights - 62, health care - 46, education, science, culture and sport - 26, finances and financial transactions – 22. The remaining petitions referred to other areas.  Over the period from January to September 2004, the Office of the Ombudsman received 1521 petitions in various areas. Procedure was initiated upon 957 of these cases.  It follows from the Ombudsman’ practice so far that citizens most often complain on delays of procedures in judicial and administrative bodies, encountered difficulties in the sphere of housing and social affairs, unemployment and other civil rights. Complaints pertaining to fundamental freedoms and rights guaranteed by the Constitution or international acts and documents were less frequent (for more details see I_G_6). External (State Audit) Pursuant to the Law on State Audit (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 73/04 – consolidated text), the external audit entails: review of documents, licences or reports on the performed internal control and audit; review of accounting and financial procedures and other records in terms of whether financial reports are accurate and present realistically the financial situation and effects of financial transactions under the accepted accounting principles and standards and the INTOSAI International Auditing Standards. The state audit also includes assessment of the use of resources in terms of cost-effectiveness and efficiency. Subject to an external audit are the following: Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, budgets of the local self-government units, funds’ budgets, budget beneficiaries and individual budget beneficiaries, public enterprises, National Bank, legal entities in which the state is the dominant shareholder, political parties funded from the Budget, agencies and other institutions established pursuant to the law, other publicly funded institutions and beneficiaries of funds of the European Union and other international organisations. Pursuant to the existing Law, external audit encompasses: inspection of documents and reports on the internal control and audit that has been carried out as well as inspection of accounting and financial procedures and other records from the aspect of whether such financial reports truthfully and objectively represent the financial situation and the results from financial operations as prescribed by accounting principles and standards, including the International Audits Standards of INTOSAI. The external audit is conducted in accordance with the timeframe determined in the Annual Programme of the State Audit Office which is adopted by the Chief State Auditor. The Programme includes: 1. Entities subject to regular annual audit pursuant to the Law: the funds’ budgets, beneficiaries of funds under the State Budget and the budget of the local self-government units, public enterprises and Budget funded political parties, and  2. Entities subject to audit in a certain number of years. Since no inclusion of all entities is possible within the Annual Programme, the selection is done under the following criteria: potential risks of deviations within the entities; percentage of their participation in the budgetary expenditures; information gathered from the media; written or verbal information; information collected during debates in the Assembly and in the municipal councils; submissions of the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption; findings of previously conducted audits and individual requests for audits. The external audit is conducted by authorised state auditors and state auditors, employed in the State Audit Office (for more details see 28_I_A_1). Pursuant to the Law, the State Audit Office submits an annual report on the conducted audits and on its operation before the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. In addition, the State Audit Office publishes its reports on its official web site, which is an obligation determined by law.  Internal Audit The internal audit in the public sector is regulated by the Law on Internal Audit in the Public Sector (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/04), and the Rulebooks on the Modes of Conduct of Internal Audit. Pursuant to the Law, the internal audit has been defined as an independent and objective activity of checking of information, verifying their accuracy and providing advice, which is aimed at enhanced operation of the entities. It assists the entities to fulfil their objectives by applying a planned, strictly determined approach of evaluation and enhancement of risk-management, control and management practices. All public sector entities are obliged to establish internal auditing units, provide resources for their operation and ensure their organisational and functional independence. Depending on their competences and the number of their employees, the internal audit in various state administration or other bodies has been organised in departments or units.  Pursuant to the Government Conclusions of its Session held on 26.01.2004, the development of internal audit and enhancement of financial control within budget beneficiaries and funds shall be conducted in three stages:   The first stage entails establishment, by 31.03.2004, of internal auditing units in 17 large-scale budget beneficiaries and training of 23 internal auditors by 30.04.2004;   The second stage includes training of internal auditors in the other budget beneficiaries and establishment of their internal auditing units by the end of 2005;   The third stage entails training of internal auditors in the local self-government units and establishment of their internal auditing units by 31.03.2006. The first stage of setting up internal auditing units has been completed and within 15 budget beneficiaries and funds such units have now been established. Inspection over the enforcement and implementation of legal and other regulations is carried out by the state administrative bodies (inspectorates) within their competences pursuant to the law. Pursuant to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, internal auditors put forward initiatives for inspection and monitor the measures undertaken by the inspection authorities (for more details see 28_I_B_11
State Administrative Inspectorate Pursuant to Article 17 of the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, the State Administrative Inspectorate is a body within the Ministry of Justice, which deals matters of administrative inspection in the Republic of Macedonia. The scope of work of the State Administrative Inspection is defined in the Law on Administrative Inspection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/04).  The inspection is carried out ex officio pursuant to the Annual Programme for the Inspectorate’s Operation and pursuant to monthly plans, as well as upon initiatives and proposals submitted by citizens, organisations and entities which, in exercise of their rights, interests and obligations, encounter irregularities in the operation of state administrative bodies or institutions with public mandates. The inspection is carried out in state administrative bodies, other state bodies, organisations, public services, institutions and other legal entities with legally assigned public mandates which decide in administrative matters, as well as in municipalities, the City of Skopje and municipalities within the City of Skopje when, as part of their competences, they decide in administrative matters on the rights, obligations and legal interests of natural persons and legal entities pursuant to law. When conducting the supervision, inspectors are authorised to carry out inspection into the enforcement of laws and other regulations and to request related information, order elimination of irregularities in the application of laws and other regulations, order specific manners of action in the state administrative body or the administrative organisation with public mandates. State administrative bodies and institutions with public mandates are obliged to enable unimpeded inspection and conduct of the administrative supervision and, if requested by the inspector, provide him/her with the necessary materials within a determined period.  When an inspector detects violation of regulations, the enforcement of which is supervised by another body, he/she has to immediately notify of such findings. If the inspector considers that by such violation a criminal act, a misdemeanour or severe violation of duties has been committed, he/she is obliged, without delays, to raise criminal charges, submit request for initiation of misdemeanour procedure or submit request for initiation of procedure to determine responsibility for severe violation of duties. If he/she has determined that a certain act is not in compliance with a law or another regulation, the inspector shall request from the state administrative body to eliminate within certain deadline the detected irregularities. If the respective body fails to do so, the inspector may initiate a procedure for assessing the constitutionality and legality of the disputed act.  In 2003, the State Administrative Inspectorate carried out 832 supervisions, 454 of which were regular inspections, 117 were controlling inspections and 261 were extraordinary inspections upon requests and initiatives by citizens. As part of these activities, direct inspection was conducted into 30,557 administrative cases. The findings were that 18,531 cases were resolved within the deadlines set forth in the Law on General Administrative Procedure and in material laws; 3685 cases were resolved after the expiry of the legally prescribed deadline; in 827 cases it was impossible to determine the time of their resolution due to the non-existence of evidence as to a successful delivery of the administrative acts; 5169 cases were not resolved although the legal deadlines were expired and in 2345 cases the period for their resolution was running. In order to ensure elimination of irregularities detected during inspection, the State Audit Office ordered 1.617 draft-measures, adopted 44 rulings (individual decisions) and submitted 5 requests for initiation of misdemeanour procedure before the competent first instance court. In the period from January to September 2004, the State Administrative Inspectorate carried out 420 supervisions, 230 of which were regular inspections, 105 were controlling inspections and 85 were extraordinary inspections upon requests and initiatives by citizens. As part of these activities, inspection was conducted into 14651 cases. The findings were that 1653 cases were resolved within the legally prescribed deadlines; in 272 cases it was impossible to determine the time of their resolution due to the non-existence of evidence as to a successful delivery of the administrative acts; for 2123 cases the legal deadline had expired and in 2345 cases the period for the resolution was running. Minutes were prepared on the findings of inspections and 830 draft-measures were proposed. For this period, the State Administrative Inspectorate has dedicated particular attention to the committees deciding on denationalisation requests and to the Government's Second Instance Committee, which decides in administrative procedure on denationalisation. Inspectors prepare minutes on the conducted inspection, presenting the detected situation. Elimination of the detected irregularities is ordered by a decision which also prescribes deadlines. On measures undertaken upon the decision, the respective bodies are obliged to inform the inspectorate within the determined deadlines. Inspectors ensure enforcement of the decision by which elimination of the detected irregularities has been ordered, by conducting controlling inspections and preparing minutes thereof. Inspectors are entitled to act upon petitions, requests, initiatives and other submissions by citizens and legal entities, when their rights have been violated by state administrative bodies.  Other Inspection Authorities  Inspection is carried out only by the state administrative bodies within their competences. For the purpose of conducting supervision, inspectorates have been established as bodies within the respective ministries. Inspection is performed by inspectors. An inspector initiates the inspection procedure  ex officio and upon requests, proposals and initiatives submitted by citizens. He/she conducts the inspection in accordance with the rules of administrative procedure and is obliged to act in compliance with law or other regulation.  Civil Servants Agency The body in the Republic of Macedonia which sets standards pertaining to civil servants and their work is the Civil Servants Agency. The Agency has been established as an autonomous state body, by the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03 and 17/04), with the status of a legal entity, which performs expert, administrative and other duties related to the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants. It drafts and adopts regulations pertaining to civil servants for which legally authorised, upon a prior opinion by: the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, President of the Republic of Macedonia, Government of the Republic of Macedonia, Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia, Supreme Court, courts, Judicial Council of the Republic, Ombudsman, Public Prosecutor’s Office, National Bank and the State Audit Office.  By rulebooks, the Civil Servants Agency sets criteria, standards and procedure for employment and selection of civil servants, and prescribes modes, procedure and criteria for carrying out the vocational and internship examinations.  The Agency adopts guidelines on the criteria for financial rewards for civil servants who have particularly contributed to the operation of the respective state body by their noteworthy engagement or quality in the performance of the assigned duties. Pursuant to Article 18 of the Law on Civil Servants, the Agency has adopted the Civil Servants’ Code of Conduct (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 9/01 and 16/04), which includes provisions on the impartiality, independence in decision-making, abuse of competence and status of civil servants, transparency of information, political activity, conflicts of financial interests, gifts and other types of benefits, protection and cost-effective management of public resources, conduct in service, conduct in private life and public relations. Civil servants are disciplinary liable for conduct in breach of the Code (for more details: I_C_6). 11. What types of legal acts exist? How and by whom are they adopted? How are they prepared? What forms of consultation are used, both inside the government (inter-ministerial co-ordination) and outside (stakeholders)? What mechanisms exist to monitor the effective implementation of legal acts by public bodies (e.g. reporting requirements, inspections)? Types of legal acts In the Republic of Macedonia the following types of legal acts exist: the Constitution, the Constitutional Law on Implementation of the Constitution, laws, promulgations, decisions, declarations, resolutions, recommendations, conclusions, decree-laws, decrees, guidelines, programmes, individual decisions, rulebooks, orders, plans, rules of procedure, statutes. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia is adopted and amended by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. The Assembly adopts a decision to amend the Constitution by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives. For the adoption of a Decision to alter the Preamble of the Constitution, the articles of the Constitution which govern the local-self government, the Article 131, any provision that refers to the rights of the members of the communities, including in particular provisions on the use of the official language (Article 7), the fundamental values of the constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 8), the equality of freedoms and rights of citizens (Article 9), the rights for confession (Article 19), the right to freely express, foster and develop the identity and community attributes of the members of the communities (Article 48), the guarantee for protection, promotion and enhancement of the historical and artistic heritage of the Republic of Macedonia and all communities in the Republic of Macedonia (Article 56), the provisions on the mode of operation and the decision-making in the Assembly of Republic of Macedonia (Article 69), on the Committee on Inter-Community Relations (Article 78), the appointment of members to the Security Council (Article 86), the election of members to the Judicial Council of the Republic (Article 104) and the election of judges to the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 109), the Articles 7, 8, 9, 19, 48, 56, 69, 77, 78, 86, 104 and 109, as well as for the adoption of a Decision to Amend the Constitution with any new provision that refers to the subject matters of these provisions and Articles, a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives is required within which there must be a majority vote of the total number of representatives belonging to non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia. The amendment to the Constitution is proclaimed by the Assembly. For the implementation of the Constitution, a constitutional law is adopted by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives. The constitutional law is proclaimed by the Assembly and it enters into force at the same time with the proclamation of the Constitution. According to the Constitutional Law on Implementation of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 52/91), the former federal legal acts are accepted as legal acts of the Republic of Macedonia, all together with the competences of the state bodies, as proclaimed in the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. This article ensured continuity of the legal system. Also, the positive law of the Republic of Macedonia - the existing legislation that the Republic of Macedonia as a federal unit had been competent to enact –- remained in force.  In the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia, only the Assembly may adopt laws. The Assembly adopts laws by a simple majority, by two-thirds or by a qualified majority (the so-called Badinter majority).  Two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives is required to adopt the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, the Law governing the types, competences, establishment, termination, organisation and composition of courts, and the procedure before courts and the Law on Defence of the Country. Local self-government is regulated by a law adopted by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives, within which there must be a majority vote of the representatives who belong to non-majority communities. Laws on local finances, local elections, municipal boundaries and the City of Skopje are adopted by a majority vote of the total number of representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the representatives belonging to the non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia. On laws that directly affect culture, use of languages, education, personal documents, and use of symbols, the Assembly decides by a majority vote of the representatives attending, within which there must be a majority vote of the attending representatives belonging to the non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia. The Constitution explicitly determines that the organisation and operation of the Assembly are regulated by Rules of Procedure adopted by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives. When performing its competencies, the Assembly adopts decisions, declarations, resolutions, recommendations and conclusions.  By a declaration the Assembly’s general position on issues of general political importance is expressed. By a resolution, the Assembly points to developments, problems and measures that are going to be undertaken in a specific area.  By a recommendation, the Assembly gives guidelines for overcoming a current situation in certain area. The Assembly takes decisions if the session is attended by a majority of the total number of Representatives, and by at least one third of the total number of its Representatives, except in the aforementioned cases. The Constitution sets forth that promulgation is enacted by the President of the Republic. By a promulgation (a Presidential decree), the President proclaims the adopted laws, appoints and recalls ambassadors and representatives of the Republic of Macedonia abroad and appoints and recalls military representatives of the Republic of Macedonia abroad. The Law on the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00 and 12/03), and the Rules of Procedure of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/02, 47/03, 64/03 and 67/03), set forth that for the purpose of exercise of its rights and carrying out its obligations and duties determined in the Constitution and the law, the Government adopts: decrees with a force of law, decrees, decisions, guidelines, programmes, individual decisions (rulings), conclusions and rules of procedure. By a decree, the Government regulates the enforcement of laws; determines principles on internal organisation of ministries and other state administrative bodies and regulates other relations pursuant to the Constitution and law. By a decision, the Government decides on particular issues and measures for the enforcement of laws; establishes expert and other services for its own needs as well as common services for the needs of the Government, ministries and other state administrative bodies. By guidelines, the Government prescribes the mode of operation of ministries and other state administrative bodies. By a programme, the Government regulates specific issues within its competence for which dynamics and deadlines need to be defined. A programme includes also a financial plan for implementation. By an individual decision, the Government appoints and dismisses directors of state administrative bodies, state secretaries in the ministries and a secretary general of the Government, makes other appointments and dismissals for which it is authorised and decides on other issues and administrative matters. By a conclusion, the Government adopts position on issues discussed at its session, determines opinions on draft-laws, other regulations and on materials submitted in the Assembly by other authorised proposers; decides on specific issues of internal organisation and relations within the Government; determines tasks of the ministries, the state administrative bodies and of its services and takes position on issues within its competence.  By a decree with the force of law, the Government regulates issues within the competence of the Assembly in case of a state of emergency or a state of war, if the Assembly cannot be convened.  The Government’s Rules of Procedure regulate more specifically its internal organisation, manner of operation and other issues relevant for the operation of the Government. The Government adopts the acts within its competence at its sessions and decides on them by a majority vote of its members. If votes on a decision are tied, the decision for which the Prime Minister has voted shall be considered adopted. The Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the RM”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), sets forth the types of acts enacted by a minister or an official heading an autonomous body of state administration.  A minister enacts: rulebooks, orders, guidelines, plans, programmes, individual decisions (rulings) and other acts for implementation of the laws and other regulations when so authorised by law. A director of an autonomous body of state administration i.e. administrative organisation enacts: rulebooks, individual decisions (rulings), orders, guidelines, plans, programmes and other acts for implementation of the laws and other regulations when so authorised by law. A rulebook elaborates on particular provisions of laws and other regulations with the purpose of their enforcement.  An order determines or prohibits actions in particular situation of general significance for enforcement of laws and other regulations. A rulebook determines the mode of action in the enforcement of particular provisions of laws and other regulations. Plans and programmes elaborate on specific issues relevant for the enforcement of laws and other regulations when their implementation requires definition of deadlines and dynamics. A minister delivers individual decisions (rulings) in the administrative procedure and when deciding upon individual issues, as well as in other cases prescribed by a law or regulation. A director of an autonomous state administrative body or a director of an administrative organisation delivers individual decisions in the administrative procedure and when deciding upon individual issues, as well as in other cases prescribed by a law or regulation. The Law on Local Self-government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/02), regulates the normative function of the municipal councils and of the mayors. In performing the duties within its competence, a municipal council adopts: statute, programmes, plans, decisions and other regulations stipulated by law. A council adopts its regulations by a majority vote of the total number of the council members, unless otherwise stipulated by the Law on Local Self-government. Municipal regulations that directly affect culture, use of languages and alphabet utilized by at least 20% of the citizens in that municipality, establishment and use of the municipality’s coat of arms and flag, are adopted by a majority vote of the council members attending, within which there must be a majority vote of the council members attending who belong to non-majority communities in that municipality. A mayor of a municipality delivers individual decisions on settlement of individual rights, obligations and interests of natural persons and legal entities. Preparation of acts The procedure to amend the Constitution has been prescribed by the Constitution, and has been further elaborated in the Assembly’s Rules of Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/02). A proposal to amend the Constitution may be submitted by the President of the Republic, the Government, at least 30 representatives of the Assembly, or 150,000 citizens. A proposal to amend the Constitution shall include guidelines for the amendments to the Constitution and explanation of the reasons to propose amendment to the Constitution. The President of the Assembly shall forward the proposal to amend the Constitution to the representatives, to the President of the Republic and to the Government, in case none of these have submitted the proposal. Upon a proposal to amend the Constitution, a general debate is held at an Assembly’s session. The Assembly adopts a decision to amend the Constitution by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of representatives. After the adoption of the decision to amend the Constitution, the Assembly by a conclusion determines a deadline by which the proposers shall prepare the text of the preliminary draft-amendment to the Constitution. The text of the preliminary draft-amendment, together with the elaboration, shall be submitted by the proposal-maker to the President of the Assembly who shall, at least 30 days before the Assembly’s session is held, forward it to the representatives, the President of the Republic and the Government, in case any of these are not proposers of the text of the preliminary draft-amendment. A reading in the Assembly is held on the preliminary draft text of each of the amendments individually and opinions and suggestions may be given. The Assembly by a majority vote of the total number of representatives determines each preliminary draft amendment individually and the preliminary draft amendments to the Constitution as a whole. The Assembly puts the preliminary draft amendments to a public debate. The Assembly sets the period for the public debate, the manner of publication of the preliminary draft amendments and the deadline by which the proposers, being the holder of the public debate, shall submit to the Assembly a report on the results of the public debate, as well as texts of the draft amendments to the Constitution. The President of the Assembly shall forward the text of the draft amendments, together with the elaboration and the report on the results of the public debate, to the representatives, the President of the Republic and to the Government, in case any of these are not proposers of the draft amendments. Each representative, Assembly’s working bodies, or the Government may submit amendments, at least 8 days before the Assembly’s session at which the amendments to the Constitution shall be adopted. A general debate shall be held as well as a reading of the text of the draft amendments to the Constitution. The Assembly votes separately on each of the amendments submitted to the draft amendments to the Constitution by a majority vote of the total number of representatives. The Assembly by a majority vote of the total number of representatives determines each draft amendment individually and the draft amendments as a whole. Pursuant to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and the Assembly’s Rules of Procedure, a proposal to adopt the law may be put forward by each of the representatives in the Assembly, the Government and at least 10,000 voters. These are the authorised law proposers.  Pursuant to the Constitution and the Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, any citizen, group of citizens, institutions and associations may submit to an authorised proposer an initiative to adopt a law. The initiative submitted to the Assembly is then forwarded to the representatives and the Government. If the authorised proposer accepts the initiative for adoption of the law, he/she may submit to the Assembly a text of the proposal to adopt the law. When the Government is authorised to propose the law, it shall be drafted by the ministry competent in the respective area. The Ministry which has drafted the proposal to adopt a law, prior to submitting it for review before the Government, requests an opinion from any ministry or a state administrative body the competence of which have common aspects with the subject matter governed by the respective law. Opinion on the proposal to adopt the law shall necessarily be requested from the Ministry of Finance – in terms of its fiscal implications, and from the Legislative Secretariat in terms of its compliance with the Constitution, the laws and other regulations, ratified international treaties and the EU legislation. When, upon a request by the Government, the proposal to adopt the law has been drafted by a special committee, scientific or specialised institution or by individual experts or academics, the Government shall request an opinion on the proposal by the competent ministry and the Legislative Secretariat. The legal practice in the Republic of Macedonia requires that the competent state administrative body which observes the developments in the respective field conducts analyses in that particular field, determines the legal and factual state of affairs and identifies the need for regulation of specific issues before the text of the proposal to adopt the law is drafted. As part of the analyses, the competent body shall survey opinions, attitudes, interests and requirements submitted before it by stakeholders (citizens, non-governmental organisations, legal entities). In the phase of the preparation of the law, the participation of stakeholders is ensured by way of public announcement of the text of the law, by organisation of public hearings etc. When making the analyses, the competent body shall, if it deems it necessary, consult academics or experts in that particular field. In addition to the analyses, it shall conduct comparative research of the methods of regulation of the particular area in other countries. The competent state administrative body which monitors the implementation of the laws in the respective area shall also conduct assessment of whether the objectives have been reached i.e. whether the practical application of the laws is efficient and sound. It shall point to all the detected weaknesses or ambiguities and shall put forward suggestions on how to overcome them in the law that is to be drafted. Based on this, the drafting of the initial text of the law the adoption of which is to be proposed shall commence. At this stage, the practice has been that more alternatives are proposed on the regulation of certain issues in the law. Laws which require their harmonisation with the EU legislation are drafted with assistance of foreign experts or are submitted for expertise that will enable consistent transposition of EU directives in the national legislation. When drafting the provisions of laws, efforts are made to ensure that they are expressed clearly, in the concise manner that ambiguities are avoided, and that provisions are mutually consistent and harmonised.  With regard to the structure of the laws, particular attention is paid to ensure that they include section of general/basic provisions, special part which includes substantial legal provisions, transitional and final provisions and provisions regulating the entry into force of the law. Depending on the substantive issues regulated in a specific law, it may also include sections on supervision and penal provisions. The Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia prescribe the form and procedure for submission of a Proposal to Adopt the Law  by the authorised proposers. The procedure for adoption of a law begins by submission of a Proposal to Adopt the Law which has to include: constitutional basis for adoption of the law, reasons for its adoption, basic principles of the law, content of the law which incorporates the basic relations being regulated and the proposed mode of their regulation. The Proposal to Adopt the Law has to be accompanied by an explanatory note. The explanatory note includes: assessment of the state of affairs in the area that is to be regulated by the law and assessment of the enforcement of the existing regulations in that area; objective to be achieved by regulating the relations by the proposed law and the amount of funds required for its implementation. The Proposal to Adopt the Law is submitted to the President of the Assembly. If the Proposal to Adopt  the Law has not been submitted by the Government, the President of the Assembly shall request an opinion on it from the Government.  If the Assembly votes in favour of the Proposal to Adopt the Law, it shall adopt a conclusion approving the Proposal. In case it votes against the Proposal, it shall reject it by a conclusion.  On the basis of the conclusion approving the Proposal, the proposer shall prepare a Draft Law. If the law that is being proposed governs organic issues or a complex or extensive subject-matter, as well as in other cases when this is considered necessary, the Assembly shall, by its conclusion approving the Proposal to Adopt the Law, decide that the proposer prepares a Preliminary Draft of the Law. If the law is not complex or extensive, the proposers may attach a Draft Law to the Proposal to Adopt  the Law and may propose a debate on it at the same session of the Assembly on which the proposal to adopt the law is discussed. If the Assembly has decided that the proposers prepares a preliminary draft of the law, the proposers shall submit before the Assembly a preliminary draft of the law in the form in which laws are adopted. The preliminary draft law has to be accompanied by an explanatory note. The proposer of a preliminary draft law which amends an existing law has to attach to the preliminary draft the text of provisions of the existing law which are being amended. The Assembly may decide to organise a public debate on a preliminary draft law of broader importance. In such a case, the preliminary draft law is published in daily newspapers selected by the Assembly. On the basis of opinions expressed in the public debate, the proposer submits a draft-law in the form in which laws are adopted. Along with the draft-law, an explanatory note is submitted on: the reasons for adoption of the law, relations that are regulated by it and information on the funds required for its implementation. The proposer shall attach the text of the provisions of the existing law that are being amended to the draft-law introducing amendments to an existing law.  Amendments to a Draft-Law may be proposed by any of the representatives, Assembly’s working bodies, the Government or 10,000 voters.  The amendments are submitted in writing to the President of the Assembly and have to be accompanied by an explanation and signed by the proposer. In the course of the debate on the Draft-Law, decision is also made on the amendments. Once the Law has been passed by the Assembly, the President of the Assembly shall submit it to the President of the Republic for its proclamation by a Presidential Decree (Promulgation). Regulations that are adopted by the Government are drafted in the ministries and in other state administrative bodies competent in the area governed therein. Before being submitted for review and approval by the Government, mandatory opinion is delivered by the Legislative Secretariat in terms of its compliance with the Constitution, the laws and other regulations ratified international treaties and the EU legislation. Concerning their financial implications, an opinion is required by the Ministry of Finance. Regulations enacted by ministers and officials managing the autonomous state administrative bodies are prepared in the respective bodies which bear competence for their adoption. Before the adoption, the minister or the director of the state administrative body is obliged to request an opinion on the regulation from the Legislative Secretariat, the Ministry of Finance and any other ministry or body the activities of which have common aspects with the subject matter governed by the regulation. When preparing the draft-laws and draft-regulations that are adopted by the Government, tables of concordance with EU acquis are also submitted. Regulations that are adopted by the municipal councils and mayors are prepared by the municipal administration. The scope of activity and the manner of execution of duties by the municipal administration is determined by the council, upon a proposal of the mayor. Forms of consultation inside and outside the Government  Ministries and other state administrative bodies coordinate the implementation of activities under the Annual Work Programme of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia through the General Secretariat of the Government. (Article 67-a – Rules of Procedure of the Government) Concerning materials and regulations that are submitted before the Government on which ministries and other state administrative bodies have opposing opinions, the General Secretariat coordinates the activities in order to resolve the matters of dispute and to examine the possible impact on the determined policy and the Strategic Priorities of the Government (Article 67-b – Rules of Procedure of the Government). State administrative bodies which carry out inspection are obliged to cooperate mutually as well as with other state administrative bodies on inspection issues of common interest.  Ministries cooperate mutually by establishing working groups for drafting of laws and other regulations, for exchange of data within their competences or exchange of specialist opinions on the implementation of laws or other regulations. If a dispute over competences or other disagreement in the implementation of the duties arises between some of the ministries the ministries in question are obliged to established inter-ministerial group to resolve the matter of dispute. If no resolution is reached in such a manner, the ministries in question inform the Government thereof.  As part of the cooperation between the Government and the municipal bodies and the bodies of the City of Skopje, the Government may, pursuant to Articles 116 and 117 of the Government’s Rules of Procedure, provide them with expert and other type of assistance relevant for the implementation of the duties within their competence, including: expert opinions and guidelines for the implementation of regulations when so requested by the municipal and the City of Skopje bodies, when there is difference of opinions on important issues for the implementation of competences of the municipalities and the City of Skopje and when regulations refer to analogous implementation by the municipalities and the City of Skopje; opinions on organisational and other issues important for the proper functioning and promotion of operation of the municipalities and the City of Skopje; as well as other types of expert assistance. Pursuant to Article 118 of the Rules of Procedure of the Government, the Government cooperates with public enterprises, public institutions and services, political parties, trade companies, and citizens' associations and foundations on issues important for the implementation of the Government’s authorities and for the exercise of rights and interests of these legal entities. At its sessions the Government examines proposals and initiatives put forward by the mentioned institutions and adopts conclusions on the basis of reports by its working bodies.  When these entities submit to the Government initiatives, requests or proposals which do not fall within its competence, the Secretary General of the Government ensures that such submissions are forwarded to competent bodies and notifies the submitters thereof. Within its rights and duties, the Government co-operates with trade unions in order to ensure the exercise of the rights, duties and responsibilities of employees in state bodies. This cooperation extends also to other issues in the framework of the collective bargaining. Companies, associations of citizens, non-governmental organisations and other legal entities submit to the Secretary General of the Government initiatives to be reviewed by the Government. If such initiatives do not fall within the Government’s competence, the Secretary General notifies the authorised proposers thereof and forwards the initiatives to the competent body or returns it to the proposers. In case the Government is authorised to review the initiative, the Secretary General requests an opinion in terms of its justification from the competent ministries. (Article 119 – Rules of Procedure of the Government) Pursuant to Article 10 of the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies, the state administrative bodies, when drafting laws and other regulations within their competence, ensure consultation with citizens through the following: public announcements of the type, content and timeframe for the adoption of the law or other regulation in question; organisation of public hearings and provision of opinions by stakeholders (citizens’ associations, legal entities etc.). Mechanisms to monitor the effective implementation of legal acts  The Government conducts supervision over the operation of the ministries, other state administrative bodies and administrative organisations. If it considers that a certain regulation adopted by a minister does not comply with the Constitution, a law or other regulation, the Government may advise thereof the respective minister. The Government may suspend the enforcement of such a regulation and may propose to the minister in question to change it in a determined period or to revoke it. The Government is entitled and obliged to abolish or annul a regulation or an act of a ministry, state administrative body or administrative organisation which does not comply with the Constitution, law or other regulation adopted by the Assembly, i.e. the Government. The proposal to abolish or annul a regulation adopted by a minister i.e. director of an autonomous state administrative body, is put forward by the Prime Minister, or its Member, if he/she considers that such a regulation does not comply with the Constitution, a law, or a Government’s regulation. Opinion on such a proposal shall be requested by the Legislative Secretariat. It shall submit its elaborated opinion before the Government and to the minister i.e. director of an autonomous state administrative body who has adopted the respective regulation. Afterwards, the Government decides upon abolishment i.e. annulment of the regulation which does not comply with the Constitution, a law or a Government’s regulation. The ministers are obliged to inform the Government of the regulations they pass which pertain to the manner of exercise of the citizens’ constitutional rights, implementation of the Government’s guidelines, management of funds (expenditures) and other important matters within their competence. ministers are obliged, upon their own initiative, or upon a request by the Government, to notify the Government on the developments in the area for the purpose of which the relevant ministry has been established, on the implementation of the determined policy of law and other regulations enforcement in that particular area, on the implementation of the Government’s conclusions and other duties assigned by the Government. The Government is entitled to abolish or annul a regulation or an act of a municipal council, of another body of a local self-government unit or of the City of Skopje.  Supervision over the operation of the state administrative bodies includes supervision over the legality and over the efficiency in the implementation of their duties. Such supervision is also conducted over public enterprises, public services and institutions, over natural persons and legal entities to which public authorities have been assigned by law. The competent body conducting supervision over the legality and efficiency in the work of the state administrative bodies shall notify them of the detected irregularities or weaknesses, if any, and shall propose a period for their elimination. In case the state administrative body in question fails to eliminate the identified irregularities or weaknesses within the determined period, the competent body shall undertake measures for their elimination. In cases when the identified irregularities or weaknesses may cause damaging effects on the exercise of rights and interests of citizens or to the operation of the respective body, the supervisory body is obliged to immediately notify thereof the Government. The supervisory body is obliged to propose to the Government a set of measures aimed at elimination of the identified irregularities or weaknesses. The supervision is conducted by a superior state administrative body, unless otherwise determined by the law. If the supervision requires engagement of a specialised institution or conduct of an expertise, the state administrative body may decide that the supervision is conducted by a specialised organisation in the respective area. The supervision over the work of the ministries is conducted by the Government. The supervision over the work of the bodies within the ministries is performed by the relevant ministries. Supervision over the operation of other state administrative bodies is conducted by the ministry competent for the administrative matters for which the respective body has been established. The supervision over the work of an administrative organisation is performed by the ministry competent for the administrative matters for which the respective organisation has been established. Supervision over the implementation and application of laws and other regulations on the part of the state bodies, public enterprises, companies, institutions, natural persons and legal entities, is conducted as an inspection by the state administrative bodies as part of their competences.  For the purpose of performing inspection, an inspectorate may be established as a body within a ministry. Inspection duties are performed by inspectors. Everyone is entitled to put forward an initiative for inspection and to propose that appropriate measures be taken by the ministries or state administrative bodies competent to perform inspection. An inspector starts and manages the inspection ex officio, in accordance with the rules of the administrative procedure. In doing so, the inspector shall prepare minutes for the inspection performed, by which he/she shall take note of the actual situation. If he/she identifies specific irregularities, he/she shall make a decision to undertake administrative measures determined by the law in that particular field. The inspector may also submit a request for initiation of a misdemeanour i.e. criminal procedure if he/she has found that a misdemeanour i.e. a criminal act has been committed as a consequence of the irregular application of the regulation. Within the exercise of its rights, duties and responsibilities, the Government harmonises and guides the operation of the state administrative bodies and may decide on general principles of the implementation of the determined policy and application of laws, other regulations and general acts passed by the Assembly or the Government. Furthermore, it may impose on these bodies a duty to adopt specific regulations and to take measures within their authorisation, may set deadlines for implementation of certain activities within their competence and request that they explore developments in areas within their scope of actions, report to the Government and propose appropriate measures. In addition to these methods of supervision, our legal system provides also for a preventive supervision, which most often entails approval of statutes. Namely, the Government i.e. the municipality gives approval to the statutes of public enterprises it has established. Furthermore, it approves the amendments to the statute or changes in the organisation of a public enterprise, its regulation on the use of the accrued funds and on the covering of losses, its borrowing act, its act setting its products and services’ prices, its balance sheet, the enterprise's business report and its annual investment programme harmonised with the overall economic development. Statutes of public services and institutions established by the Government are approved by the ministries competent in the respective fields. Certain laws set forth duties for specific bodies to report to the ministries and to the Government. For example, pursuant to Article 67 of the Health Insurance Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/00, 36/00, 30/01, 48/01, 50/01, 11/02 and 31/03), the Health Insurance Fund is obliged to submit a report on its operation to the Ministry of Health and to the Government at least once a year. Pursuant to Article 162 paragraph 3 of the Law on Pension and Disability Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 35/95, 40/96, 70/96, 71/96, 24/97, 25/97, 32/97, 24/00, 96/00, 5/01, 58/01, 85/03 and 50/04), the Management Board of the Pension and Disability Fund has to report about its work to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, at least once a year. Pursuant to Article 54 of the Law on Fully Funded Pension Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 29/02 and 85/03), the Agency for Supervision of Fully Funded Pension Insurance submits a report about its work in the previous year to the Government. Its report is adopted by the Government.  The Law on Local Self-government governs the control over the legality of municipal regulations before and after their publication in the municipal official gazette. Thus, the mayor conducts control over the legality of the councils’ regulations before their publication. If the mayor considers that a council’s regulation does not comply with the Constitution or a law, he/she is obliged to suspend its publication by enacting, within 7 days form its submission, a decision elaborating on the reasons for its suspension. The council is obliged, within 15 days from the day of the publication of the decision, to review it and decide on it. If the council approves the regulation, the mayor is obliged to publish it and, at the same time, to submit an initiative for a procedure before the Constitutional Court in order to assess the constitutionality and legality of the disputed regulation. For such an initiative, the mayor is obliged to inform the minister of Local Self-government.  The Ministry of Local Self-government conducts supervision over the legality of regulations of the units of local self-government and the City of Skopje. The mayor is obliged, no later than 10 days from the day of publication of a municipal regulation, to forward it to the Ministry of Local Self-government. If the Ministry of Local Self-government considers that the respective regulation is not in compliance with the Constitution or a law, it is obliged to suspend its application by enacting, within 45 days from its submission, a decision elaborating on the reasons for its suspension. Such a  decision is published in the “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”. Within 30 days from the day of the publication of the decision, the Ministry of Local Self-government shall submit to the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia an initiative to assess the constitutionality and legality of the suspended regulation. If no procedure is initiated before the Constitutional Court within this deadline, the validity of the decision suspending the application of the municipal regulation shall terminate and it shall become effective. Prior supervision exists on the local level, as well, and it entails prior approval of the municipal regulations. If, when adopting a municipal regulation, prior approval is required by another body, it shall provide such approval within 60 days from the day the draft regulation has been submitted to it. If the prior approval has not been provided within this period, the regulation shall be deemed accepted as it has been proposed by the municipality. 12. What mechanisms exist to link strategic planning and budgeting, in each Ministry, at Governmental level? Basic governmental mechanisms linking strategic and budgetary planning in each of the ministries are defined in the Decision on the Methodology of Strategic Planning and Drafting of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia Annual Work Programme and the Budget Circular. The strategic planning process provides the Government with a mechanism to identify the objectives deemed priority (identification of priorities). By integrating the process of identifying priorities with the budgetary process, the Government’s capacity to carry out its functions has substantially increased. The most important point taken into account by the Government in the strategic planning process is the fact that the budget funds are limited i.e. that the Government has limited financial power to carry out its plans. Therefore, due to the inter-connection between the process of definition of priorities and the budgetary process, the Strategy, Planning and Monitoring Sector in the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Budgets and Funds Sector in the Ministry of Finance are jointly responsible to coordinate the process of defining priorities and the budgetary process. The strategic planning is a complex process that involves all ministries.  It affects the policy development process in such a way that it clarifies what policy-related compromises and trade-offs have to be made in order to accommodate the process of policy implementation in a fiscally restricted budget framework. For that purpose, the required institutional capacities are being developed within the ministries (sectors or units) which should support the strategic planning and the budget preparation process and ensure that each budget user prepares its budget submission in accordance with the previously developed strategic plan. 1. Definition of Government strategic priorities The first step in the strategic planning process is the definition of Government strategic priorities. Strategic priorities entail major changes relating to specific issues and problems that the Government intends to address. Strategic priorities are established on a general level and are more wide-ranging than the specific initiatives by the ministries.  Several ministries may engage in the definition and implementation of strategic priorities. The strategic priorities may refer to a period of several years, and as they greatly influence the human and financial resources in the next year budget, they exceed individual ministry’s capacity. The selected priorities are determined by a Government decision. The decision is preceded by an analysis prepared by the General Secretariat of the Government on the basis of existing documents that contain guidelines for development of the government policies. Accordingly, at the start of the process of definition of 2004 strategic priorities, the Government’s General Secretariat prepared an analysis based on the Programme presented by its President upon his appointment, the existing development-related documents, the Framework Agreement etc. In accordance with the analysis, the Secretariat drafted a Decision on the Strategic Priorities of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia for 2004, adopted by the Government on its Session held on 9.06.2003. The Government approved six strategic priorities for 2004: 1.  Implementation of the Framework Agreement; 2.  Employment increase and poverty reduction; 3.  Stabilisation of the country’s security and defence and the NATO integration process; 4.  The EU integration process; 5.  Fight against organised crime and corruption and strengthening of the rule of law; 6.  Public sector optimisation. Taking into account the political developments in the country, the Government adopted the Decision on the Strategic Priorities of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia for 2005, on 6.09.2004: I.  Strategic priorities of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia are, in continuity, NATO and European Union integration. II.  As priority objectives and initiatives in the implementation of the 2005 strategic priorities, the following have been established: 1. Full and consistent implementation of the Constitutional amendments, laws and other regulations stemming from the Framework Agreement and implementation of the remaining obligations thereof; 2.  Decentralisation of power and development of local self-government; 3. Judicial reform; 4.  Strengthening the fight against organised crime and corruption; 5.  Accelerating the economic development, providing incentive for the domestic and attracting foreign investments; 6.  Strengthening the market economy and reduction of unemployment and poverty. 2. Allocation of funds for strategic priorities as part of the Fiscal Strategy Following the adoption of the Decision on the Strategic Priorities, the Government initiates the budget process by establishing the next year fiscal projections and by adopting a fiscal strategy. At this stage, the Government sets the overall expenditures limit on the basis of the fiscal balance or projected deficit, and the revenue projections. Within the overall expenditure limit, the Government establishes “set-aside“ funds for the strategic priorities. The amount of funds allocated for the strategic priorities is determined by the fiscal plan potentials, while taking into account the realistically probable savings amount. The competent ministry for the preparation of the Fiscal Strategy is the Ministry of Finance which proposes, in consultation with the General Secretariat, the “set-aside” funds that are to be allocated for support of the Government strategic priorities. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia projected an amount of 400.000.000 MKD in the 2004-2006 Fiscal Strategy to finance specific initiatives and activities of the ministries and other state bodies that support the implementation of the 2004 strategic priorities. Funds in the amount of 492.706.000 MKD to support the implementation of the strategic priorities were allocated in the 2004 Budget.3. Establishment of individual priority initiatives to implement the strategic priorities of the Government Following the establishment of the overall amount of “set-aside” funds to carry out the strategic priorities of the Government in the Fiscal Strategy, the General Secretariat and the Ministry of Finance jointly recommend for approval by the Government the initiatives submitted by specific line ministries, including an assessment of the extent to which they contribute to the implementation of the strategic priorities and their viability in the context of the allocated funds for specific purposes in the Fiscal Strategy. Once the initiatives that are to be financed from the next year budget have been determined, the ministries incorporate them in their strategic plans and budget calculations. The decisions on approval of the initiatives and on the ministries budget submissions based on the budget circular are taken separately. Although both procedures preceding the decision-making process are carried-out almost concurrently, the decision on the initiatives is made prior to the completion of the ministries’ budget proposals, in order to enable incorporation of the approved initiatives in the overall Budget Proposal for the next year.4. Establishment and adoption of strategic plans and ministries' budget proposals The budget proposal is a supplement to and a document appended to the ministries’ strategic plans. The strategic plan presents the main goals and priorities of the respective ministry, provides description of each of the programmes and the manner in which it contributes to the achievement of the ministry’s objectives, as well as the strategies that the ministry will follow - all these within the budget limitations. To this end, one of the basic qualitative changes proposed with the 2005 Budget Circular is the integration of the strategic plans of the budget users within the budget planning process. In accordance with the 2003 Action Plan for Implementation of the Recommendations included in the European Commission’s Stabilisation and Association Report on the Republic of Macedonia, as well as the 2004 European Partnership Action Plan the budget users are obliged to prepare functional analyses, including a separate document – a Strategic Plan. The following budget users have already prepared their strategic plans: Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Finance, General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, Customs Administration, State Audit Office, Directorate for Protection of Classified Information, Protection and Rescue Directorate, Commodity Reserves Bureau, Civil Aviation Administration, Hydro-Meteorological Directorate, Veterinary Directorate, State Archive and Struga Penitentiary. The development of strategic plans is underway in the other budget users. The budget submission provides detailed description of the manners in which the ministry allocates its resources for the programmes and the strategies indicated in its strategic plan. The deadlines for submission of the budget proposals and strategic plans of the ministries are coordinated. The Ministry of Finance and the General Secretariat provide coordinated assessment of the plans and budget proposals of the ministries, in particular in terms of implementation of the Government priorities. In addition, the Ministry of Finance checks the accuracy and rationality of the projected expenditures and the allocation of funds, i.e. whether they comply with the fiscal strategy and the budget circular letter. 5. Establishment of the Government Annual Work Programme Once the specific priorities have been defined as part of the budgetary process, a detailed Government Annual Work Programme is developed, in accordance with the Government’s Rules of Procedure. The Annual Work Programme includes a list of documents and draft-regulations that the ministries plan to submit before the Government in the course of the year. In addition to the initiatives defined through the budget process, the list also includes other priorities related in particular to the European Union integration and to the obligations under various international agreements, as well as to individual priorities of the ministries. In case these initiatives require funds, they are to be coordinated through the budgetary process. The Government’s General Secretariat is responsible for the drafting of the Annual Work Programme. The activities undertaken by the General Secretariat when drafting the Annual Programme include an assessment of the extent to which the ministries' programmes are in line with the Government strategic priorities and whether specific initiatives are not included. Consistency between the ministries’ programmes and the budget funds provided for such programmes is ensured through coordination of the General Secretariat’s work with the Ministry of Finance. 6. Monitoring of the implementation of the Government strategic priorities and the Annual Work Programme  The Government monitors the pace of implementation of the strategic priorities and the Annual Work Programme. An analysis of the achievements is made by the end of the year. The General Secretariat coordinates the monitoring. 13. What structures exist to ensure the coordination of European Integration issues? Pursuing its commitment to integrate in the European Union, ever since 1992, the Republic of Macedonia has been developing structures in charge of relations with the European Union and for coordination of European integration issues. The development of the European integration coordination structure has in continuity been motivated by the goal of the Republic of Macedonia to accede to the European Union, clearly defined as early as its independence, and has followed the advancement of the Euro-integration process in the country.  Today this system has the following basic structure:  Parliamentarian (legislative) level - Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia:    Committee on European Affairs; Government (executive) level:    Committee for Euro-Atlantic Integration;   Deputy Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia;    Minister of Foreign Affairs; Central (administrative) level:    Sector for European Integration;    Ministry of Foreign Affairs;    European integration units in the Ministries; Inter-ministerial structure:    Working Committee on European Integration (substructure: Sub-Committee on Approximation of Legislation and the Working Groups on Harmonisation of Legislation with the acquis communautaire);   Committee of Ministers for Foreign Aid Coordination (substructure: Coordinative Technical Group).  (See Organigram: I_Annex_04Following a Decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 62/97 and 12/98), the Committee on Euro-Atlantic Integration was established, chaired by the Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia. The members of the Committee are the Deputy Prime Ministers, the Minister of Foreign Affairs, the Minister of Finance, the Minister of Defence, the Minister of Internal Affairs, the Minister of Justice, the Minister of Economy, the Minister of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, the Minister of Environment and Physical  Planning, and the Minister of Transport and Communication. Three additional members, proposed by the Prime Minister, may participate in the work of the Committee, as well as the President of the Macedonian Academy of Arts and Sciences and the Governor of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Prime Minister designates a Deputy Prime Minister in charge of European issues. The Deputy Prime Minister in charge of European issues is responsible for coordination of all Government activities in the process of the country’s European integration and activities under the Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union and its Member States. The Deputy Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia is at the same time National Foreign Aid Coordinator.  The Working Committee on European Integration at the Government of the Republic of Macedonia  was established following a Decision on Establishment of  the Working Committee for European Integration at the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 63/97). The Working Committee is chaired by the Deputy Prime Minister in charge of European integration and the Deputy-Chairperson is the Minister of Economy. The Secretary of the Working Committee is the Head of Sector for European Integration. In the period of 1997-2003 the members of the Working Committee were the deputy ministers. Afterwards a new Decision on Establishment of Working Committee on European Integration at the Government of the Republic of Macedonia was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 25/03), according to which the members of the Working Committee are the state secretaries. Representatives of the Legislative Secretariat, the State Statistical Office, the Customs Administration, the Civil Servants Agency and the National Bank also participate in the activities of the Working Committee.  The main tasks of the Working Committee are:    Coordination and synchronisation of the activities in the Stabilisation and Association Process of the Republic of Macedonia and in the process of European integration;    Monitoring the implementation of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union and its Member States;    Monitoring the overall financial cooperation of the Republic of Macedonia with the European Union;    Monitoring the work of the Sub-Committee on Approximation of National Legislation and its working groups and sub-groups;    Monitoring and providing guidelines for the work of the network of units for European integration in the ministries;    Monitoring all other issues related to the process of European integration of the Republic of Macedonia.  In accordance with the Rules of Procedure of the Working Committee on European Integration, the  Sub-Committee of the Working Committee for European Integration for Approximation of Legislation is established. The main task of the Sub-Committee is to develop the Annual Programme for Approximation of National Legislation with the EU legislation, following the priority areas defined in the Stabilisation and Association Agreement. Furthermore, the Sub-Committee monitors the implementation of the Annual Programme for Approximation of National Legislation with that of the EU. The Sub-Committee is composed of a Chairperson, Secretary and members. The Chairperson of the Sub-Committee is the Head of the Sector for European Integration in the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Members of the Sub-Committee are senior civil servants from the ministries, the Legislative Secretariat and other state bodies and institutions. The Sub-Committee for Approximation of Legislation has Working Groups and Sub-Groups for Harmonisation of the Legislation of the Republic of Macedonia with the acquis communautaire.  According to the screening structure, 29 working groups are established. The working groups and sub-groups monitor the process of harmonisation of the national legislation, deliver expert opinions on given areas in terms of legislative harmonisation, give guidelines and recommendations on the implementation of the National Programme for Approximation of National Legislation.  The Sector for European Integration at the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (SEI) is the central administrative structure at the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in charge of coordination of the European integration process.  The present organisational structure of the Sector for European Integration is a result of several previous stages of development. After the Republic of Macedonia became a beneficiary of the PHARE Programmes on 1 September 1996, an Aid Coordination Unit was established. The intensification of the cooperation with the EU resulted in strengthening of the institutional structure for European integration. Hence, in March 1999, the Aid Coordination Unit was transformed into a European Integration Unit. In accordance with the Rulebook on Internal Organisation of the General Secretariat of the Government, adopted on 8 October 2001, the European Integration Unit was transformed into a Sector for European Integration. The Sector for European Integration currently has 52 full time employees, and six persons are engaged based on service contracts. According to the Rulebook amending the Rulebook on Systematisation of Jobs in the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, 85 posts are envisaged for the Sector. The SEI builds its capacities, inter alia, through the Programme of Scholarships for European Post-Graduate Studies, under which 21 persons have received scholarships and are/will be engaged at the SEI, i.e. other ministries after completion of their studies.  The main competence of the Sector for European Integration is to coordinate and guide the process of European integration within the state administrative bodies of the Republic of Macedonia. In addition, the SEI provides administrative support to foreign assistance coordination activities.  According to the Rulebook Amending the Rulebook on Internal Organisation of the General Secretariat as a Service of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, the Sector for European Integration is responsible for:    Following and studying the policies and legislation of the European Union;    Coordination and expert assistance to the process of approximation of the legislation of the Republic of Macedonia with that of the EU;    Monitoring of, and undertaking measures for, implementation of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union;    Building and strengthening the institutional infrastructure required for the integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the European Union;   Long-term resource planning in support of the EU integration process;    Monitoring and providing support to the process of training the public administration in European Union integration issues;    Coordination of the network of European integration units in the ministries and other state administrative bodies;    Programming and planning the priorities of the Republic of Macedonia in utilising foreign assistance;    Regulating the relations with the donors, of foreign assistance coordination and implementation of foreign assistance programmes;    Providing support to the Government bodies, with competencies in issues of the integration of the Republic of Macedonia in the European Union;    Managing the process of translation of European Union legislation and other materials related to the process of integration of the Republic of Macedonia in the European Union;    Implementation of the public relations strategy in the process of integration of the Republic of Macedonia in the European Union;    Other activities related to the coordination, support and guidance of the process of integration of the Republic of Macedonia in the European Union.  The SEI is organised in seven units:    Unit for Integration in the Economic-Social Area;    Unit for Integration in the Area of Justice and Home Affairs;   Unit for Institution Building;    Unit for General Affairs and Budget;    Unit for Foreign Assistance Coordination;    Unit for Translation of EU Legislation    Unit for Public Relations.  The Unit for Integration in the Economic-Social Area and the Unit for Integration in the Area of Justice and Home Affairs monitor the policies and legislation of the EU, the harmonisation of the legislation of the Republic of Macedonia with that of the EU and the implementation of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the EU in the respective areas.  The Unit for Institution Building is in charge of strengthening the internal infrastructure necessary for the integration of the Republic of Macedonia in the EU, as well as of the training, coordination of the network of units for European integration at the ministries and other state administrative bodies and of promoting the cooperation with the civil sector in the area of European integration. The Unit is also in charge of bilateral cooperation with the countries in the region, through conclusion of Memoranda of Cooperation or other agreements.  The Unit for General Affairs and Budget provides expert and administrative support to the Working Committee on European Integration provides IT support to the process of European integration, is in charge of the human resource management, the planning and monitoring of the budget allocations for European integration, and for the documentation and the library.  The Unit for Foreign Assistance Coordination is in charge of the process of programming and planning the priorities of the Republic of Macedonia for utilisation of foreign assistance, coordination of activities of multilateral and bilateral donors and providing administrative support to the Committee of Ministers for Foreign Aid Coordination, chaired by the National Foreign Aid Coordinator. The Committee members are the Deputies of the Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia, the Minister of Finance, the Minister of Foreign Affairs, and the Minister of Economy. The Coordinative Technical Group harmonises the positions at technical level, drafts decisions and monitors the implementation of the conclusions reached by the Committee.  The Unit for Translation of EU Legislation manages the process of translation of the EU legislation, the expert and legal revision and proof reading of the translated documents and the establishment of the counter-part terminology. The line ministries have established technical committees for translation dealing with expert and legal terminology revision of the translated documents, which also include external experts.  The Unit for Public Relations manages the implementation of the Public Relations Strategy in the process of European Integration, and is especially focused on providing timely information about the process of European integration of the Republic of Macedonia, maintaining the web page, communication with the media, monitoring and analysing the public opinion about the European integration process, organising briefings and press conferences.  There are plans to change the status of the Sector for European Integration and to transform it into a Secretariat for European Affairs, as a special and autonomous service of the Government, with the capacity of a legal entity, managed by a Deputy Prime Minister. Such changes in its status would strengthen its coordinative function and would help build its capacities.  The Ministry of Foreign Affairs is in charge of the relations of the Republic of Macedonia with the EU, the political dialogue, the Common Foreign and Security Policy of the EU and the Common Security and Defence Policy. As part of its regular activities, the Ministry carries out the diplomatic communication of the Republic of Macedonia with the European Union institutions, through the Mission of the Republic of Macedonia in Brussels, as well as with the member-countries through the diplomatic and consular missions of the Republic of Macedonia. The Ministry of Foreign Affairs ensures that the Republic of Macedonia presents unison positions in the relations with the EU.  In 1992, a special unit in charge of EU related issues was established in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. In 1994, there was an assistant minister appointed for relations with the European Community; upon the establishment of diplomatic relations between the Republic of Macedonia and the EU by the end of 1995, a Department for European Integration in the Ministry was established.  Today the EU Department has the following Units:    Contractual Relations Unit;    European Union Integration Process Unit;    European and Regional Cooperation Unit.  The Contractual Relations Unit monitors the fulfilment of contractual relations between the Republic of Macedonia and the EU, undertakes activities for their advancement and upgrading in all areas, prepares the meetings of the Stabilisation and Association Council, the political dialogues between the Republic of Macedonia and the EU and the meetings with the EU institutions.  The European Union Integration Process Unit initiates, coordinates and monitors the activities in the process of accelerated rapprochement of the Republic of Macedonia with the EU; it prepares the meetings of the Committee for Euro-Atlantic Integration, participates in the activities of the Working Committee on European Integration and in the Government committees and bodies on issues related to the Republic of Macedonia-European Union relations, participates in the process of drafting  strategies for accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the EU.  The European and Regional Cooperation Unit deals with the Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP) and the European Security and Defence Policy (CSDP); it coordinates the process of alignment of the Republic of Macedonia with the joint declarations, statements and demarches under the CFSP of the EU; it follows and analyses the process of stabilisation and association of the other countries; it coordinates activities for implementation of the European Neighbourhood Policy; it coordinates activities under the Stability Pact.  Units for European integration (departments or units) are established in all ministries, except in the Ministry of Defence. Their tasks are analogous to those of the central Sector for European Integration at the Government. They are the key element in the chain of coordination of activities related to European integration in the Ministries, as well as with the Sector for European Integration at the central Government level. Currently, they employ 54 persons. The units for European integration function in a network, coordinated by the Sector for European Integration at the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, as the legislative body, has its role in the process of harmonisation of the Macedonian legislation with that of the EU; it also has the role of controlling the executive branch of power, and the role of raising public awareness about the Euro-integration process. Each three months, the Government submits a Report to the Assembly about the progress of the Euro-integration process.  The Assembly has established a Committee on European Integration, which exclusively deals with the process of European integration. The Committee has a Chairperson, 12 members and their deputies (for more details see I_B_2). The Committee considers issues related to:    Harmonisation of the proposals for adoption of laws, i.e. The harmonisation of draft laws with EU legislation;    Monitoring and promoting the process of harmonisation of the legislation of the Republic of Macedonia with that of the EU; proposing measures for improvement of the harmonisation procedures; giving opinions and proposals for activities of the working bodies of the assembly in this area;  
  Fulfilment of obligations under agreements between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union;    Monitoring the activities of the Government and the state administrative bodies aimed at accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the European Union and giving proposals and recommendations in this respect;  
  Implementation of programmes and other acts of European institutions in the Republic of Macedonia including the financial assistance programmes;  
  Regular informing of the Assembly on all issues related to the European integration;  
  Initiation and implementation of activities for public information in connection with the European integration processes;  
  Cooperation with counter-part committees of other countries; and  
  Considers other European integration related issues.  
The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia through its 15 members (and their deputies) participate in the work of the Parliamentary Committee on Stabilisation and Association, established as a forum for exchange of views between the members of the European Parliament and the members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia.  Procedures for examination of the harmonisation of the proposed laws with the legislation of the European Union have been established in the legislative process in the Republic of Macedonia.  The Rules of Procedure of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/01, 98/02, 47/03, 64/03 and 67/03), stipulate that the proposers of legal acts, subject to harmonisation with the acquis communautaire, are obliged to enclose a Statement on conformity with the acquis communautaire. The Statement contains data on the EU documents with which the proposed legal acts are harmonised, the level of harmonisation, reasons for eventual discrepancies and terms for achieving complete harmonisation. The Statement also contains information on the conformity with the SAA.  Following the adoption of the Law Amending the Law on Government of the Republic of Macedonia in 2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/03), Legislative Secretariat was entrusted to provide assessments on the conformity of legal acts with the EU legislation.  In accordance with the Decision Amending the Decision on Establishment of Working Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 20/03), the Legislative Committee of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia considers draft legal acts from the viewpoint of their conformity with the EU legislation (for more details see I_B_2).  14. Please describe in detail how far the Republic of Macedonia has advanced in implementing the commitments taken in the Framework Agreement concluded at Ohrid on 13 August 2001 (see also Section J below). The main goal of the Framework Agreement is building of an integrated multi-ethnic society, which will guarantee the peace, stability and democratic development of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Framework Agreement is an expression of the inviolability of the sovereignty,  territorial integrity and the unitary character of the state; it has helped restore the stability on the country’s entire territory, developing mechanisms for future confidence building.  The Framework Agreement prompted substantive changes of the constitutional order and legislation, aimed at significant advancement of the rights of ethnic communities, thus making the motives for ethnically based conflicts in the Republic of Macedonia illegitimate. Furthermore, the principles of equitable representation and enhanced inclusion in public life are the basis for the reintegration of the Macedonian society, increasing its cohesion.   Therefore, the Framework Agreement has become the prerequisite for the economic development, for investments and creation of new jobs, as well as for the integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the EU and NATO.  The Framework Agreement was signed on 13.08.2001, in Skopje. The signatories were the Presidents of the then four most relevant political parties (SDSM, VMRO-DPMNE, DPA and PDP). The negotiations for the conclusion of the Agreement were held under the auspices of President Boris Trajkovski, and its guarantors were representatives of the international community – the Special Envoys of the USA and of the EU.  The Framework Agreement consists of:  1. Basic text of the Agreement  2. Annexes 
 Annex A: Constitutional Amendments 
 Annex B: Legislative Modifications 
 Annex C: Implementation and Confidence-Building Measures  The Basic text of the Agreement consists of the following Sections: 1. Basic Principles 2.  Cessation of Hostilities 3.  Development of Decentralised Government  4.  Non-Discrimination and Equitable Representation  5.  Special Parliamentary Procedures 6.  Education and Use of Languages  7.  Expression of Identity 8. Implementation 9. Annexes 10. Transitional and Final Provisions  The implementation of the Framework Agreement is a complex, continuous process. Its implementation is of importance not only in terms of establishing the country’s stability, but also in terms of building a democratic and prosperous Republic of Macedonia. One of the highest strategic priorities of this Government is the timely and complete fulfilment of the obligations arising under the Framework Agreement.  Furthermore, its implementation is continuously supported by the international community, both politically and financially, starting with the mediation in the negotiations for signing of the Ohrid Framework Agreement and the Donor Conference organised for support of its implementation in March 2002.  The presentation on the implementation of the Ohrid Framework Agreement follows the structure of its text:  1. Basic Principles
1.1. The use of violence in pursuit of political aims is rejected completely and unconditionally. Only peaceful political solutions can assure a stable and democratic future for Macedonia. 1.2. Macedonia's sovereignty and territorial integrity, and the unitary character of the State are inviolable and must be preserved. There are no territorial solutions to ethnic issues. All extracts from the Framework Agreement are given in italic. 1.3. The multi-ethnic character of Macedonia’s society must be preserved and reflected in public life. 1.4. A modern democratic state in its natural course of development and maturation must continually ensure that its Constitution fully meets the needs of all its citizens and comports with the highest international standards, which themselves continue to evolve. 1.5. The development of local self-government is essential for encouraging the participation of citizens in democratic life, and for promoting respect for the identity of communities. The basic principles of the Framework Agreement have been and are supported by all relevant political factors in the Republic of Macedonia, forming the basis of the platform for cooperation among political parties-coalition partners in the Government established in November 2002.  2. Cessation of Hostilities 2.1. The parties underline the importance of the commitments of July 5, 2001. There shall be a complete cessation of hostilities, complete voluntary disarmament of the ethnic Albanian armed groups and their complete voluntary disbandment. They acknowledge that a decision by NATO to assist in this context will require the establishment of a general, unconditional and open-ended cease-fire, agreement on a political solution to the problems of this country, a clear commitment by the armed groups to voluntarily disarm, and acceptance by all the parties of the conditions and limitations under which the NATO forces will operate. The signing of the Framework Agreement facilitated the cessation of hostilities and the parties clearly expressed their agreement for political resolution of the problems in the country. A process of disarmament of the ethnic Albanian armed groups started and gradually conditions were created for presenting and realising of the political claims through legitimate political subjects.  On 15.08.2001, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia agreed to the deployment of the NATO Task Force for the operation “Essential Harvest” that collected the voluntarily handed over weapons.  Following a Decision of the President of the Republic of Macedonia of 28.08.2001, according to the set conditions to be fulfilled by the Army of the Republic of Macedonia for the start of the operation “Essential Harvest”, the units of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia relocated some of the tanks and heavy armament. The Task Force conducted passive collection of weapons and coordinated the transfer and destruction of the weapons and ammunition. According to the Report of the NATO structures in the Republic of Macedonia, 3875 pieces of weapons and 397.625 pieces of mines, explosives and ammunition were collected.  After the NATO forces concluded the operation, the members of the ethnic Albanian armed groups were given the opportunity to reintegrate in the society following the adoption of the Law on Amnesty (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/02). The Law was fully implemented (for more details see I_M_2). Furthermore, after the completion of this operation, the state security forces, with a participation of ethnic Albanian police officers, gradually re-entered former crisis regions and started fulfilling peace-time law enforcement obligations in all parts of the country, strictly abiding by international standards and general human rights principles and accepting the monitoring by the OSCE and the EUMM.  However, even after the “Essential Harvest” operation, there has been a high number of incidents involving the use of weapons, in which a number of citizens were killed or injured. This has clearly led to the conclusion that there are still large quantities of illegal weapons in the hands of the citizens, especially in the former crisis regions.  Therefore, in 2003, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Law on Voluntary Hand-Over and Collection of Firearms, Ammunition and Explosives and on Weapons Legalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/03). A special Coordinative Body was established to implement the operation of voluntary hand-over of weapons, supported by a public awareness campaign. The action lasted from 01.11 to 15.12.2003, at 123 collection points throughout the Republic of Macedonia.  The quantities of weapons handed-over, according to the international standards classification (SEESAK) were:  1. Weapons, total of 7.571 pieces 2. Ammunition, total of 100.219 pieces 3. Explosives, total of 1.257 pieces and 165,35 kg explosive 4. Accompanying arms, total of 1.001 pieces and 497,65 m fuse and cable.  In connection with the return of the police in the former crisis regions, the permanent police presence countrywide and the consolidation of the rule of law in the former crisis regions, see I_F_2 and I_F_4.   3. Development of Decentralised Government 3.1. A revised Law on Local Self-Government will be adopted that reinforces the powers of elected local officials and enlarges substantially their competencies in conformity with the Constitution (as amended in accordance with Annex A) and the European Charter on Local Self-Government, and reflecting the principle of subsidiarity in effect in the European Union. Enhanced competencies will relate principally to the areas of public services, urban and rural planning, environmental protection, local economic development, culture, local finances, education, social welfare, and health care. A law on financing of local self-government will be adopted to ensure an adequate system of financing to enable local governments to fulfil all of their responsibilities. 3.2. Boundaries of municipalities will be revised within one year of the completion of a new census, which will be conducted under international supervision by the end of 2001. The revision of the municipal boundaries will be effectuated by the local and national authorities with international participation. 3.3. In order to ensure that police are aware of and responsive to the needs and interests of the local population, local heads of police will be selected by municipal councils from lists of candidates proposed by the Ministry of Interior, and will communicate regularly with the councils. The Ministry of Interior will retain the authority to remove local heads of police in accordance with the law. The development of decentralised government according to this Section, implied Amendments to the Constitution, defined in Annex A and amending legislation as set forth in Annex B to the Framework Agreement.  Amendment XVII was integrated in the Constitution: Amendment XVII In units of local self-government, citizens directly and through representatives participate in decision-making on issues of local relevance particularly in the fields of public services, urban and rural planning, environmental protection, local economic development, local finances, communal activities, culture, sport, social security and child care, education, health care and other fields determined by law. In the city of Skopje, citizens directly and through representatives participate in decision-making on issues of relevance to the city of Skopje particularly in the fields of public services, urban and rural planning, environmental protection, local economic development, local finances, communal activities, culture, sport, social security and child care, education, health care and other fields determined by law. The legislation in this area was amended in accordance with items 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Annex B:  The parties will take all necessary measures to ensure the adoption of the legislative changes set forth hereafter within the time limits specified. B.1. Law on Local Self-Government The Assembly shall adopt within 45 days from the signing of the Framework Agreement a revised Law on Local Self-Government. This revised Law shall in no respect be less favourable to the units of local self-government and their autonomy than the draft Law proposed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in March 2001. The Law shall include competencies relating to the subject matters set forth in Section 3.1 of the Framework Agreement as additional independent competencies of the units of local self-government, and shall conform to Section 6.6 of the Framework Agreement. In addition, the Law shall provide that any State standards or procedures established in any laws concerning areas in which municipalities have independent competencies shall be limited to those which cannot be established as effectively at the local level; such laws shall further promote the municipalities’ independent exercise of their competencies. B.2. Law on Local Finance  The Assembly shall adopt by the end of the term of the present Assembly a law on local self-government finance to ensure that the units of local self-government have sufficient resources to carry out their tasks under the revised Law on Local Self-Government. In particular, the law shall:  Enable and make responsible units of local self-government for raising a substantial amount of tax revenue;  Provide for the transfer to the units of local self-government of a part of centrally raised taxes that corresponds to the functions of the units of local self-government and that takes account of the collection of taxes on their territories; and Ensure the budgetary autonomy and responsibility of the units of local self-government within their areas of competence. B.3. Law on Municipal Boundaries The Assembly shall adopt by the end of 2002 a revised law on municipal boundaries, taking into account the results of the census and the relevant guidelines set forth in the Law on Local Self-Government. B.4. Laws Pertaining to Police Located in the Municipalities The Assembly shall adopt before the end of the term of the present Assembly provisions ensuring:   That each local head of the police is selected by the council of the municipality concerned from a list of not fewer than three candidates proposed by the Ministry of the Interior, among whom at least one candidate shall belong to the community in the majority in the municipality. In the event the municipal council fails to select any of the candidates proposed within 15 days, the Ministry of the Interior shall propose a second list of not fewer than three new candidates, among whom at least one candidate shall belong to the community in the majority in the municipality. If the municipal council again fails to select any of the candidates proposed within 15 days, the Minister of the Interior, after consultation with the Government, shall select the local head of police from among the two lists of candidates proposed by the Ministry of the Interior as well as three additional candidates proposed by the municipal council;   That each local head of the police informs regularly and upon request the council of the municipality concerned;  That a municipal council may make recommendations to the local head of police in areas including public security and traffic safety; and  That a municipal council may adopt annually a report regarding matters of public safety, which shall be addressed to the Minister of the Interior and the Public Attorney (Ombudsman). Accordingly, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted all the above-mentioned laws, which enlarged the competencies of the local self-government units and ensured adequate financing:  1.  Law on Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 05/02); 2.  Law on Territorial Organisation of the Local Self-Government in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04); 3.  Law on the City of Skopje (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04); 4.  Law on Financing the Units of Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 61/04 and 96/04); 5.  Law on Communal Fees (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04); 6.  Law Amending the Law on Administrative Fees (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04); 7.  Law on Property Taxes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04); 8.  Law Amending the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/02). Laws Nos. 1-3 envisage enlarged competencies of the units of local self-government in accordance with the above quoted provisions of the Framework Agreement, as well as new territorial organisation of the Republic of Macedonia, defining also an appropriate solution for the City of Skopje. The Law on Territorial Organisation of the Republic of Macedonia and the Law on the City of Skopje were disputed under the initiative for a Referendum, which was in favour of returning to the old territorial organisation of 1996. At the Referendum held on 8.11.2004, the initiative did not get the necessary support, enabling continuation of the process of decentralisation in compliance with the Framework Agreement and the relevant adopted laws.  Under the new Laws, the number of municipalities was reduced from 123 to 84, with average population of 25.000 inhabitants. The Skopje City area now has 10 instead of 7 city municipalities, and the relations between the municipalities and the City administration have been clearly defined.  Laws Nos. 4-7 regulate the revenues for the units of local self-government, in accordance with the conditions laid down in the Framework Agreement, i.e. local self-government authorities are ensured sufficient resources enabling them to fulfil their responsibilities, in compliance with the new Law on Local Self-Government. Furthermore, the laws ensured relevant budgetary autonomy and responsibility for the units of local self-government.  Law No. 8 fully incorporates the provisions of the Framework Agreement regarding the election of local heads of police and the obligation that the local police head communicates with and reports to the Municipal Council, as well as the possibility of the Council to adopt a report on the public safety to be forwarded to the Minister of Interior and to the Ombudsman. These provisions will be applied after the election of the new local authorities, or 01.07.2005 at the latest.  In addition, the Assembly has adopted a series of laws in other sectors, defining the transfer of competencies from the central to the local authorities, in accordance with the adopted Operational Programme of Decentralisation (for more details see I_C_17). In accordance with the above stated, the provisions of the Framework Agreement contained in Section 3 - Development of Decentralized Government have been fully incorporated in the Macedonian legislation and their practical implementation will follow the local elections, to be held on 13.03.2005.  Provision 3.2 of the basic text of the Framework Agreement also envisaged organising a new census of the population. This provision is elaborated in item 2.1 of Annex C to the Framework Agreement:  C. 2.1. The parties confirm the request for international supervision by the Council of Europe and the European Commission of a census to be conducted in October 2001. The Census was held in November 2002. According to the Census results, the ethnic structure of the population is the following:  
Total 
Male Female Republic of Macedonia 2022547 100 1015377 1007170 Macedonians 1297981  64,2 648178 649803 Albanians 509083 25,2 258195  250888 Turks 77959 3,9  39550 38409 Roma 53879 2,7  27137 26742 Vlachs 9695 0,5  5146 4549 Serbs 35939 1,8  18580 17359 Bosniacs 17018 0,8 8634  8384 Others 20993 1,0  9957 11036 Source: State Statistical OfficeIn 2001, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia invited the European Commission and the Council of Europe to organise international monitoring of the Census of Population and Households. The objectives of the monitoring were to ensure that the Census is carried out in accordance with the international standards, to encourage citizens to take part in the census and to increase the trust in the census process.  The Final Report of the international monitoring of the Census was published in December 2003, concluding that the 2002 Census of Population and Households in Macedonia was carried out professionally and successfully, in line with international census standards. This, on its part, means full implementation of the referred to provisions of the Framework Agreement.   4. Non-Discrimination and Equitable Representation 4.1. The principle of non-discrimination and equal treatment of all under the law will be respected completely. This principle will be applied in particular with respect to employment in public administration and public enterprises, and access to public financing for business development. 4.2. Laws regulating employment in public administration will include measures to assure equitable representation of communities in all central and local public bodies and at all levels of employment within such bodies, while respecting the rules concerning competence and integrity that govern public administration. The authorities will take action to correct present imbalances in the composition of the public administration, in particular through the recruitment of members of under-represented communities. Particular attention will be given to ensuring as rapidly as possible that the police services will generally reflect the composition and distribution of the population of Macedonia, as specified in Annex C. 4.3. For the Constitutional Court, one-third of the judges will be chosen by the Assembly by a majority of the total number of Representatives that includes a majority of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. This procedure also will apply to the election of the Ombudsman (Public Attorney) and the election of three of the members of the Judicial Council. In general terms, the Framework Agreement stipulates two types of mutually connected measures to ensure enhanced participation of non-majority communities in all spheres of public life: the principle of non-discrimination and equal treatment (referred to in item 4.1) on one hand, and equitable representation on the other (referred to in items 4.2 and 4.3). Even prior to the Framework Agreement, in Macedonia, the principles of non-discrimination and equal treatment were legally regulated in a manner compatible with the EU and Council of Europe standards. In respect of the second type of measures, even prior to the Ohrid Framework Agreement, in specific areas there were measures of de facto (and de jure in the field of education) positive discrimination applied.  The new quality that the Framework Agreement adds are the numerous measures for active and prompt change of the level of participation of the non-majority communities in many spheres, primarily by ensuring equitable representation and positive discrimination. Specifically, provisions contained in Section 4 were transposed into constitutional amendments, as set forth in Annex A and legal regulations, as set forth in Annex B to the Framework Agreement.  Namely, Amendments VI, XI, XIII, XIV  XV have been incorporated in the Constitution: Amendment VI  The fundamental values of the constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia are: - the basic freedoms and rights of the individual and citizen, recognized in international law and set down in the Constitution; - equitable representation of persons belonging to all communities in public bodies at all levels and in other areas of public life; … Amendment XI The Assembly elects the Public Attorney (Ombudsman) by a majority vote of the total number of Representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. The Public Attorney protects the constitutional rights and legal rights of citizens when violated by bodies of state administration and by other bodies and organisations with public mandates. The Public Attorney shall give particular attention to safeguarding the principles of non-discrimination and equitable representation of communities in public bodies at all levels and in other areas of public life. Amendment XIII The President of the Republic is President of the Security Council of the Republic of Macedonia. The Security Council of the Republic is composed of the President of the Republic, the President of the Assembly, the Prime Minister, the ministers heading the bodies of state administration in the fields of security, defence and foreign affairs and three members appointed by the President of the Republic. In appointing the three members, the President shall ensure that the Security Council as a whole equitably reflects the composition of the population of Macedonia. The Council considers issues relating to the security and defence of the Republic and makes policy proposals to the Assembly and the Government. Amendment XIV The Republic’s Judicial Council is composed of seven members. The Assembly elects the members of the Council. Three of the members shall be elected by a majority vote of the total number of Representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. Amendment XV The Constitutional Court of Macedonia is composed of nine judges. The Assembly elects six of the judges to the Constitutional Court by a majority vote of the total number of Representatives. The Assembly elects three of the judges by a majority vote of the total number of Representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. The legislation in this field was amended in accordance with items 5 and 9 of Annex B:  B.5. Laws on the Civil Service and Public Administration The Assembly shall adopt by the end of the term of the present Assembly amendments to the laws on the civil service and public administration to ensure equitable representation of communities in accordance with Section 4.2 of the Framework Agreement. B.9. Law on the Public Attorney The Assembly shall amend by the end of 2002 the Law on the Public Attorney as well as the other relevant laws to ensure: - That the Public Attorney shall undertake actions to safeguard the principles of non-discrimination and equitable representation of communities in public bodies at all levels and in other areas of public life, and that there are adequate resources and personnel within his office to enable him to carry out this function; - That the Public Attorney establishes decentralized offices;  - That the budget of the Public Attorney is voted separately by the Assembly; - That the Public Attorney shall present an annual report to the Assembly and, where appropriate, may upon request present reports to the councils of municipalities in which decentralized offices are established; and - That the powers of the Public Attorney are enlarged: - To grant to him access to and the opportunity to examine all official documents, it being understood that the Public Attorney and his staff will not disclose confidential information; - To enable the Public Attorney to suspend, pending a decision of the competent court, the execution of an administrative act, if he determines that the act may result in an irreparable prejudice to the rights of the interested person; and - To give to the Public Attorney the right to contest the conformity of laws with the Constitution before the Constitutional Court. In line with Amendment XI and item 9 of Annex B, a new Law on the Ombudsman was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03), which defines the manner of election, dismissal, competencies of the Ombudsman and the manner of operation of this institution. This Law incorporates principles set forth in several constitutional amendments:  In accordance with Amendment XI, the Assembly elects the Ombudsman by a majority vote of the total number of representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia; In accordance with Amendment XI, the Law envisages that, in performing tasks within his/her competence, the Ombudsman shall undertake measures and activities for which he/she is authorised according to this Law to protect the constitutional and legal rights of citizens when violated by state administration bodies, bodies of the units of local self-government and public institutions and services and to safeguard the principles of non-discrimination and equitable representation of communities. In accordance with Amendment VI, the Law prescribes that in the election of Deputies to the Ombudsman, equitable representation of citizens belonging to all communities shall be ensured, while respecting the conditions prescribed by law;  -  In accordance with Amendment V on use of languages, the Law stipulates that in the proceedings before the Ombudsman, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet, an official language is also the language and alphabet used by at least 20% of the citizens. In the communication of citizens with the Ombudsman the provisions of the Law on General Administrative Procedure shall be appropriately applied, i.e., they may communicate in one of the official languages and its alphabet, while the Ombudsman shall reply in the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet and in the language and alphabet used by the applicant.  Furthermore, the Law fully incorporates the obligations under item 9 of Annex B, i.e.  the Law envisages establishment of decentralized offices of the Ombudsman; appropriate resources and personnel at the Ombudsman’s Office, enabling the performance of the Ombudsman functions; separate voting on the budget of the Ombudsman by the Assembly; submission of an annual report to the Assembly and upon request to the municipal councils; and enlargement of the competencies of the Ombudsman. These provisions of the Law have been implemented,  as described in I_G_ 6I_G_ 7I_G_ 8 I_G_ 9 and I_J_18.  The Constitutional Amendment XIII has been fully implemented in the appointment of members of the National Security Council of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Constitutional Amendment XIV has been transposed into the Law on the Judicial Council of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/03), which has been fully implemented in the election of the members of the Republic’s Judicial Council in 2003.  The Constitutional Amendment XV has been fully implemented in the election of the judges for the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia.  In compliance with Amendment VI to the Constitution and item 5 of Annex B, the following Laws have been adopted:  1.  Law Amending the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/02); 2.  Law Amending the Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/03); 3.  Law Amending the Law on Public Enterprises (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/03);  4.  Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04); 5.  Law Amending the Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 64/03). Laws Nos. 1-3 envisage that in employment at a state body, at municipal body i.e. municipal bodies of the City of Skopje, public institutions, public enterprises and other legal entities that have public mandate, the principle of equitable representation of citizens belonging to all communities shall be respectively applied, while respecting the criteria of expertise and competence.  Laws Nos. 4 and 5 stipulate that in the appointment of the Public Prosecutor and Deputy Public Prosecutors, and judges and lay judges, respectively, while respecting the criteria laid down by law, equitable representation of citizens belonging to all communities in the Republic of Macedonia shall be ensured. Furthermore, all these Laws prescribe the obligations of publishing all advertisements for employment i.e. appointment in at least two daily newspapers, one of which is in the language of the communities that do not constitute the majority.  In the period following the signing of the Ohrid Framework Agreement, the Governments of the Republic of Macedonia have introduced specially designed policies, aimed at practical improvement of equitable representation of non-majority communities in the public administration, focussing especially on the police and army structures. The objective pursued in this context was to fully implement obligations set forth in Annex C - Implementation and Confidence-Building Measures - to the Framework Agreement.  C.5. Non-Discrimination and Equitable Representation C.5.1. Taking into account i.a. the recommendations of the already established governmental commission, the parties will take concrete action to increase the representation of members of communities not in the majority in Macedonia in public administration, the military, and public enterprises, as well as to improve their access to public financing for business development.  C.5.2. The parties commit themselves to ensuring that the police services will by 2004 generally reflect the composition and distribution of the population of Macedonia. As initial steps toward this end, the parties commit to ensuring that 500 new police officers from communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia will be hired and trained by July 2002, and that these officers will be deployed to the areas where such communities live. The parties further commit that 500 additional such officers will be hired and trained by July 2003 and that these officers will be deployed on a priority basis to the areas throughout Macedonia where such communities live. The parties invite the international community to support and assist with the implementation of these commitments, in particular through screening and selection of candidates and their training. The parties invite the OSCE, the European Union, and the United States to send an expert team as quickly as possible in order to assess how best to achieve these objectives.  C.5.3. The parties also invite the OSCE, the European Union, and the United States to increase training and assistance programs for police, including: - professional, human rights, and other training;  - technical assistance for police reform, including assistance in screening, selection and promotion processes;  - development of a code of police conduct; - cooperation with respect to transition planning for hiring and deployment of police officers from communities not in the majority in Macedonia; and - deployment as soon as possible of international monitors and police advisors in sensitive areas, under appropriate arrangements with relevant authorities. C.5.4. The parties invite the international community to assist in the training of lawyers, judges and prosecutors from members of communities not in the majority in Macedonia in order to be able to increase their representation in the judicial system. Since the main focus was placed on improving the ethnic structure of the police and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, these provisions (item 5.2. of Annex C specifies the requirements for the police) have already been fully implemented. This has facilitated the establishment of multi-ethnic police patrols that have successfully returned to the former crisis regions, and were accepted and supported by the local population. Training, defined in item 5.3. of Annex C, has been or is currently realized. For more details see I_F_3I_F_8I_F_10 and I_J_7.  Following the improvement of the equitable representation in the security forces, the focus was placed on equitable representation in the administration and public enterprises. Therefore, in February 2003, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Basis for Preparation of a Programme for Improvement of Equitable Representation of Communities in the Public Administration and in Public Enterprises.  In April 2003, additional measures were adopted to improve the equitable representation of communities in the public administration and in public enterprises specifically related to: building translation capacities, opening bilingual posts, analysis of vacancies in the administration, and training program for recruitments in the public administration, as well as to communication strategy. As part of the additional measures, supported by the CARDS 2002 funds, 600 persons belonging to the non-majority communities - candidates for expert-administrative civil servants in the state administration have been trained. The first group of these candidates were employed in December 2004-Janaury 2005; the second group will be employed in the state administration in February 2005.  On 01.03.2005, the training of 100 translators/interpreters belonging to the non-majority communities for work in the state administration bodies and in the courts will commence. Following the training, which is organized under a project of the 2004 CARDS Programme, the selected candidates will be employed in the state administration bodies and courts, and will be obliged to work in those bodies for at least 2 years after completing the training. However, the general conclusion in this respect is that in the last two years there has been an evident increase of the representation of all communities in the administration, which has required and requires significant budget allocations. The overall participation of non-majority communities in the public administration rose to 19,69 %, while the participation of the Albanian community rose to 14,54% (for more details see I_J_4I_J_5, and I_J_7). It has to be taken into account that the entire process was conducted in a period of strict budgetary conditions and of downsizing the number of employees in the administration, which added to the complexity of the process, making it even more painful.  Accordingly, provisions contained in Section 4 of the Framework Agreement have been fully implemented  in the laws and in practice. However, the general policy of equitable representation requires continuous activities and permanent political and financial commitments.  5. Special Parliamentary Procedures 5.1. On the central level, certain Constitutional amendments in accordance with Annex A and the Law on Local Self-Government cannot be approved without a qualified majority of two-thirds of votes, within which there must be a majority of the votes of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. 5.2. Laws that directly affect culture, use of language, education, personal documentation, and use of symbols, as well as laws on local finances, local elections, the city of Skopje, and boundaries of municipalities must receive a majority of votes, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. Provisions of Section 5 have been transposed in constitutional amendments, as defined in Annex A and in the legislation, in compliance with Annex B of the Framework Agreement.  Namely Amendments X, XII, XVI  XVIII have been incorporated in the Constitution:  Amendment X For laws that directly affect culture, use of language, education, personal documentation, and use of symbols, the Assembly makes decisions by a majority vote of the Representatives attending, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the Representatives attending who claim to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. In the event of a dispute within the Assembly regarding the application of this provision, the Committee on Inter-Community Relations shall resolve the dispute. Amendment XII The Assembly shall establish a Committee for Inter-Community Relations. The Committee consists of seven members each from the ranks of the Macedonians and Albanians within the Assembly, and five members from among the Turks, Vlachs, Roma and two other communities. The five members each shall be from a different community; if fewer than five other communities are represented in the Assembly, the Public Attorney, after consultation with relevant community leaders, shall propose the remaining members from outside the Assembly. The Assembly elects the members of the Committee. The Committee considers issues of inter-community relations in the Republic and makes appraisals and proposals for their solution. The Assembly is obliged to take into consideration the appraisals and proposals of the Committee and to make decisions regarding them. In the event of a dispute among members of the Assembly regarding the application of the voting procedure specified in Article 69(2), the Committee shall decide by majority vote whether the procedure applies. Amendment XVI Local self-government is regulated by a law adopted by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. The laws on local finances, local elections, boundaries of municipalities, and the city of Skopje shall be adopted by a majority vote of the Representatives attending, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the Representatives attending who claim to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. Amendment XVIII The decision to initiate a change in the Constitution is made by the Assembly by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives. The draft amendment to the Constitution is confirmed by the Assembly by a majority vote of the total number of Representatives and then submitted to public debate. The decision to change the Constitution is made by the Assembly by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives. A decision to amend the Preamble, the articles on local self-government, Article 131, any provision relating to the rights of members of communities, including in particular Articles 7, 8, 9, 19, 48, 56, 69, 77, 78, 86, 104 and 109, as well as a decision to add any new provision relating to the subject matter of such provisions and articles, shall require a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of Representatives claiming to belong to the communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia. The change in the Constitution is declared by the Assembly. These constitutional provisions are fully implemented, i.e. all referred to laws are adopted or amended in accordance with the described procedure.  6. Education and Use of Languages 6.1. With respect to primary and secondary education, instruction will be provided in the students' native languages, while at the same time uniform standards for academic programs will be applied throughout Macedonia. 6.2. State funding will be provided for university level education in languages spoken by at least 20 percent of the population of Macedonia, on the basis of specific agreements.  6.3. The principle of positive discrimination will be applied in the enrolment in State universities of candidates belonging to communities not in the majority in the population of Macedonia until the enrolment reflects equitably the composition of the population of Macedonia... The right to primary and secondary education in the languages of the nationalities (i.e. non-majority communities) is set forth in the 1991 Constitution (Article 48 of the Constitution) and previously in the legislation of the Socialist Republic of Macedonia in the framework of the former SFRY. This right has already been realized in practice. Hence, in this context, the Framework Agreement only reaffirms and emphasises the already existing normative and de facto situation. Primary and secondary education instruction in the Republic of Macedonia is carried out in the Macedonian, Albanian, Turkish and in the Serbian languages and there are optional classes for studying the Vlach and the Roma languages.  Out of 344 elementary schools in total, in the 2002/03 academic year, in 134 schools the instruction was carried out exclusively in Albanian language or in Albanian and in Macedonian languages. Out of 90 secondary schools in the Republic of Macedonia, in 26 schools instruction is carried out in Albanian.  The same academic year, the percentage of ethnic Albanians in the total number of pupils in secondary education was 18,57%, and this academic year (2004/05) the percentage is 22,52%.  The Assembly has adopted the following laws:    Law Amending the Law on Primary Education (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia No. 63/04) and   Law Amending the Law on Secondary Education (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  No. 67/04),  which only additionally enabled keeping pedagogical records in the language and alphabet of persons belonging to communities, in addition to the Macedonian and its Cyrillic alphabet.  In accordance with item 6.2. the Law on the Establishment of State University in Tetovo was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 8/04), thus fulfilling the obligation for state funding of higher education in the language spoken by at least 20% of the population in the Republic of Macedonia. The instruction at the Tetovo University started in the 2004/05 academic year, following the accreditation of this higher education institution.  Pursuant to item 6.3 the Law Amending the Law on Higher Education was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03), under which positive discrimination has become legal obligation in enrolment at state universities. However, it has to be mentioned that this measure has been practically applied by the state universities ever since 1994. Namely, as of 1994 the Government sets a separate quota for government funding of higher education of students belonging to all minorities depending on their proportional representation in the total population (for example if 1000 are to be enrolled under state funding, in addition to this 1000 student quota, 230 Albanians could additionally be enrolled under state funding, since at that time the percentage of Albanians was 22.6%). Until 2003, this practice was applied based on a Government Decision, followed by a public advertisement for enrolment of students at the then two state universities (in Skopje and in Bitola). By pursuing such policy of evident positive discrimination in the field of higher education, the number of students belonging to the Albanian community has rapidly grown from 2,23% in 1992 to 5,7% in 2000.  Following the establishment of the University of Southeast Europe (privately financed university, supported by the international community, offering education in Albanian, Macedonian and English) and the start of the Tetovo University, the percentage of enrolled students Albanians reached 15,5% of the total number of students in the Republic of Macedonia (for more details see  I_J_16). 6.4. The official language throughout Macedonia and in the international relations of Macedonia is the Macedonian language. 6.5. Any other language spoken by at least 20 percent of the population is also an official language, as set forth herein. In the organs of the Republic of Macedonia, any official language other than Macedonian may be used in accordance with the law, as further elaborated in Annex B. Any person living in a unit of local self-government in which at least 20 percent of the population speaks an official language other than Macedonian may use any official language to communicate with the regional office of the central government with responsibility for that municipality; such an office will reply in that language in addition to Macedonian. Any person may use any official language to communicate with a main office of the central government, which will reply in that language in addition to Macedonian. 6.6. With respect to local self-government, in municipalities where a community comprises at least 20 percent of the population of the municipality, the language of that community will be used as an official language in addition to Macedonian. With respect to languages spoken by less than 20 percent of the population of the municipality, the local authorities will decide democratically on their use in public bodies. 6.7. In criminal and civil judicial proceedings at any level, an accused person or any party will have the right to translation at State expense of all proceedings as well as documents in accordance with relevant Council of Europe documents.  6.8. Any official personal documents of citizens speaking an official language other than Macedonian will also be issued in that language, in addition to the Macedonian language, in accordance with the law. Provisions of items 6.4-6.8 have been transposed into the Constitutional Amendments, as defined in Annex A and in the legislation, in accordance with Annex B of the Framework Agreement.  Namely, Amendment V was incorporated in the Constitution.  Amendment V The Macedonian language, written using its Cyrillic alphabet, is the official language throughout the Republic of Macedonia and in the international relations of the Republic of Macedonia. Any other language spoken by at least 20 percent of the population is also an official language, written using its alphabet, as specified below. Any official personal documents of citizens speaking an official language other than Macedonian shall also be issued in that language, in addition to the Macedonian language, in accordance with the law.  Any person living in a unit of local self-government in which at least 20 percent of the population speaks an official language other than Macedonian may use any official language to communicate with the regional office of the central government with responsibility for that municipality; such an office shall reply in that language in addition to Macedonian. Any person may use any official language to communicate with a main office of the central government, which shall reply in that language in addition to Macedonian. In the organs of the Republic of Macedonia, any official language other than Macedonian may be used in accordance with the law. In the units of local self-government where at least 20 percent of the population speaks a particular language, that language and its alphabet shall be used as an official language in addition to the Macedonian language and the Cyrillic alphabet. With respect to languages spoken by less than 20 percent of the population of a unit of local self-government, the local authorities shall decide on their use in public bodies. Annex B defines the relevant legislative changes:  B.7. Rules of the Assembly The Assembly shall amend by the end of the term of the present Assembly its Rules of Procedure to enable the use of the Albanian language in accordance with Section 6.5 of the Framework Agreement, paragraph 8 below, and the relevant amendments to the Constitution set forth in Annex A. B.8. Laws Pertinent to the Use of Languages The Assembly shall adopt by the end of the term of the present Assembly new legislation regulating the use of languages in the organs of the Republic of Macedonia. This legislation shall provide that:  Representatives may address plenary sessions and working bodies of the Assembly in languages referred to in Article 7, paragraphs 1 and 2 of the Constitution (as amended in accordance with Annex A);  Laws shall be published in the languages referred to in Article 7, paragraphs 1 and 2 of the Constitution (as amended in accordance with Annex A); and  All public officials may write their names in the alphabet of any language referred to in Article 7, paragraphs 1 and 2 of the Constitution (as amended in accordance with Annex A) on any official documents. The Assembly also shall adopt by the end of the term of the present Assembly new legislation on the issuance of personal documents. The Assembly shall amend by the end of the term of the present Assembly all relevant laws to make their provisions on the use of languages fully compatible with Section 6 of the Framework Agreement. Hence, in accordance with Amendment V to the Constitution and in accordance with items 7 and 8 of Annex B, the following Laws were adopted: . In respect of the Assembly rules and publication of laws (item 7 and 8):    Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 60/02);   Law Amending the Law on Publication of Laws and other Regulations and Decrees in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 43/02). This enabled members of the Assembly to use the language spoken by at least 20% of the citizens at the plenary sessions and at meetings of the working bodies of the Assembly, while laws published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia are published also in the language and alphabet used by at least 20% of the citizens, belonging to the non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia.  Both provisions are fully and continuously implemented.  B. In connection with court proceedings (item 6.7) and communication with local units of ministries (paragraph 4 of Amendment V):    Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/02);   Law Amending the Law on Civil Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/02);   Law Amending the Law on Execution Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 64/03);   Law Amending the Law on Administrative Disputes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 44/02);   Law Amending the Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/02). Under these legislative amendments, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet, in the proceedings before courts and state administration bodies and other state bodies, another official language is the language and alphabet used by at least 20% of the citizens, in accordance with the respective laws.  Furthermore, in April 2004, the Rules of Procedure amending the Court Rules of Procedure were adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 27/04), which aimed at facilitating the application of Amendment V and the above referred to legislative changes regarding the court proceedings. Forms for correspondence with the parties to the court proceedings were developed, and in accordance with the amendments to the procedural laws and the Rules of Procedure Amending the Court Rules of Procedure, the translation of the forms has been distributed to all judicial bodies in the Republic of Macedonia. In order to improve the transparency and to inform citizens about the implementation of the Framework Agreement and Amendment V to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the forms for correspondence with the parties to court proceedings were published in the daily newspaper in the Albanian language “Flaka”, and in the Macedonian language daily newspaper “Utrinski Vesnik” (for more details see I_J_14). Following the amendments to the procedural laws, which regulate the right to use the languages of the communities in judicial and administrative proceedings, there is an on-going selection procedure and training of translators belonging to the non-majority communities to be recruited in the state administration bodies and courts, as explained in Section 4 - Non-Discrimination and Equitable Representation.  The provisions related to the communication with the local units (offices) of state administration bodies are currently being implemented. Thus, tenders have been published for the printing of bilingual forms (for more details see I_J_13). C. In respect of personal identification documents (item 8) the following laws were adopted:    Law Amending the Law on Personal Identity Card (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/02 and 16/04);    Law Amending the Law on Personal Identification Records (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 38/02);   Law Amending the Law on Travel Documents of Citizens of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/03 and 46/04);   Law Amending the Law on Road Traffic Safety (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/02 and 38/04). Following the adoption of the above referred to Laws, all personal identification documents of citizens (personal identification cards, passports, birth, marriage, death certificates, driving licenses, registration certificates) and their forms are issued in accordance with item 6.8, i.e. Amendment V to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia.  In practice, the issuance of these documents also in the languages of the communities has started, in accordance with the legal amendments (for more details see I_J_15). D. Regarding personal names (item 8):  This provision setting forth the possibility all public officials to write their names in the alphabet of the language used by at least 20% of the citizens is applied in practice, although not regulated in a specific law.  E. In respect of local self-government The provisions related to the issue of official languages at the level of units of local self-government have already been incorporated in the laws regulating this area. Accordingly, in all municipalities in which at least 20% of the population uses a certain language, that language and its alphabet are in official use, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet, meaning that this provision has been fully implemented.  Furthermore, the Law Amending the Law on Road Traffic Safety (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/02), sets forth that traffic signs, in units of local self-government in which at least 20% of the citizens speak an official language different from the Macedonian, shall be written in that language and its alphabet.  Additionally, in the field of use of languages, the adoption of the following laws should be mentioned:    Law on Election of Members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 42/02);     Law Amending the Law on Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 11/04);    Law Amending the Law on Local Elections (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/04); and    Law Amending the Law on the Census of Population, Households and Dwellings 2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/02).  These Laws define the use of language and alphabet of persons belonging to the communities in the ballots, while the Law Amending the Law on Local Elections defines the use of the language and alphabet of persons belonging to the communities in all election related activities. Following the amendments to the Law on the Census, the Census is carried out in the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet and in the languages and alphabet of all ethnic communities.  These legal provisions were fully implemented in the elections for Members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in 2002, and in the elections for President of the Republic of Macedonia in 2004, as well as in the course of the 2002 Census. See answer to question I_H_33The only remaining Law to be adopted in accordance with Section 6 is the Law on Use of Languages of Communities in the Republic of Macedonia, which will be adopted in the first half of 2005. The Law on Official Seals and the Law on Referendum and other forms of direct expression of citizens will also be appropriately amended.  7. Expression of Identity 7.1. With respect to emblems, next to the emblem of the Republic of Macedonia, local authorities will be free to place on front of local public buildings emblems marking the identity of the community in the majority in the municipality, respecting international rules and usages. Provisions of Section 7 have been transposed in the Constitutional Amendments, as defined in Annex A and in the additional provisions on the implementation of confidence building measures in accordance with Annex C of the Framework Agreement.  Namely, Amendments VII, VIII and IX have been incorporated in the Constitution: Amendment VII The freedom of religious confession is guaranteed. The right to express one's faith freely and publicly, individually or with others is guaranteed. The Macedonian Orthodox Church, the Islamic Religious Community in Macedonia, the Catholic Church, and other Religious communities and groups are separate from the state and equal before the law. The Macedonian Orthodox Church, the Islamic Religious Community in Macedonia, the Catholic Church, and other Religious communities and groups are free to establish schools and other social and charitable institutions, by ways of a procedure regulated by law. Amendment VIII Members of communities have a right freely to express, foster and develop their identity and community attributes, and to use their community symbols. The Republic guarantees the protection of the ethnic, cultural, linguistic and religious identity of all communities. Members of communities have the right to establish institutions for culture, art, science and education, as well as scholarly and other associations for the expression, fostering and development of their identity. Members of communities have the right to instruction in their language in primary and secondary education, as determined by law. In schools where education is carried out in another language, the Macedonian language is also studied. Amendment IX The Republic guarantees the protection, promotion and enhancement of the historical and artistic heritage of Macedonia and all communities in Macedonia and the treasures of which it is composed, regardless of their legal status. The law regulates the mode and conditions under which specific items of general interest for the Republic can be ceded for use. Item 6 of Annex C follows the same direction:  C.6. Culture, Education and Use of Languages C.6.1. The parties invite the international community, including the OSCE, to increase its assistance for projects in the area of media in order to further strengthen radio, TV and print media, including Albanian language and multiethnic media. The parties also invite the international community to increase professional media training programs for members of communities not in the majority in Macedonia. The parties also invite the OSCE to continue its efforts on projects designed to improve inter-ethnic relations. Separate bodies have been established for promotion of the culture and education of persons belonging to the non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia:    Office for Affirmation and Promotion of the Culture of Persons Belonging to the Communities in the Republic of Macedonia within the Ministry of Culture;   Office for Development and Promotion of the Education in the Languages of Persons Belonging to Communities, within the Ministry of Education and Science.  For more details see I_J_18As regards the media, there has been evident progress after the National Broadcaster - the Macedonian Radio and Television - introduced a channel broadcasting programs in the languages of all non-majority communities in the Republic of Macedonia. At this channel, sessions of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia are broadcast with simultaneous translation into the Albanian language.  Amendment VIII envisages free use of symbols of the communities. This issue is to be legally regulated by the Law on Use of Symbols of the Communities to be adopted in the first half of 2005. In practice, even now, in municipalities having a majority of ethnic Albanian population, the Albanian ethnic flag, which is identical to the state flag of neighbouring Republic of Albania, is hoisted at public premises.  8. Implementation 8.1. The Constitutional amendments attached at Annex A will be presented to the Assembly immediately. The parties will take all measures to assure adoption of these amendments within 45 days of signature of this Framework Agreement. 8.2. The legislative modifications identified in Annex B will be adopted in accordance with the timetables specified therein. 8.3. The parties invite the international community to convene at the earliest possible time a meeting of international donors that would address in particular macro-financial assistance; support for the financing of measures to be undertaken for the purpose of implementing this Framework Agreement, including measures to strengthen local self-government; and rehabilitation and reconstruction in areas affected by the fighting. In accordance with the above stated, these provisions have been fully implemented.  Annex A to the Framework Agreement envisaging 15 Amendments to the 1991 Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia was fully implemented on 16.11.2001, when the Assembly adopted these Amendments (Amendments IV-XVIII). Except for certain modifications of the Constitution Preamble and the provision regarding religious communities (in respect of which there was full agreement reached among the signatories of the Framework Agreement) the text of the amendments adopted by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia is identical to the text of the Amendments contained in Annex A to the Framework Agreement.  Annex B has been implemented in its major part (see above), including the adoption of the Law on Election of Members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 42/02), in accordance with item 6 of Annex B, based on which the Parliamentary elections were held on 15.09.2002. In the first quarter of 2005, the two remaining laws arising from the Framework Agreement are to be adopted: the Law on the Use of Languages of the Communities and the Law on the Use of Symbols of the Communities.  In compliance with the provisions of Annex C (those which have not been elaborated in the hitherto text of the Answer):    The Parliamentary elections were held on 15.09.2002, under international monitoring and according to the ODIHR assessment they were principally in line with the international standards, fair and democratic.    In respect of return of displaced persons, reconstruction and rehabilitation of the former crisis regions, the Framework Agreement, in this Annex, envisages the following:  C.3. Refugee Return, Rehabilitation and Reconstruction C.3.1. All parties will work to ensure the return of refugees who are citizens or legal residents of Macedonia and displaced persons to their homes within the shortest possible timeframe, and invite the international community and in particular UNHCR to assist in these efforts. C.3.2. The Government with the participation of the parties will complete an action plan within 30 days after the signature of the Framework Agreement for rehabilitation of and reconstruction in areas affected by the hostilities. The parties invite the international community to assist in the formulation and implementation of this plan. C.3.3. The parties invite the European Commission and the World Bank to rapidly convene a meeting of international donors after adoption in the Assembly of the Constitutional amendments in Annex A and the revised Law on Local Self-Government to support the financing of measures to be undertaken for the purpose of implementing the Framework Agreement and its Annexes, including measures to strengthen local self-government and reform the police services, to address macro-financial assistance to the Republic of Macedonia, and to support the rehabilitation and reconstruction measures identified in the action plan identified in paragraph 3.2. the OSCE to continue its efforts on projects designed to improve inter-ethnic relations. In the course of the crisis, the number of internally displaced persons reached 76.046 (on 11.09.2001), 3921 of whom were accommodated in collective centres and the other with host families. The process of their return required stabilisation of the political and security situation, return of the police, reconstruction of damaged houses and rehabilitation of the communities and the economy.  After the Donor Conference, intensive activities for reconstruction of the houses started (6634 objects were damaged). At the end of 2004, there remained 112 objects eligible for reconstruction, for which no funds were provided.  Most of the internally displaced persons returned to their homes and according to the new registration, the current number of displaced persons is 1424. In cooperation with donors, the Government has envisaged several instruments for economic rehabilitation of these regions (for more details see I_K_1I_K_2I_K_3 and I_K_4). 15. How is the implementation of the Framework Agreement coordinated? Which are the bodies involved? The implementation of the Framework Agreement is coordinated at several levels, as a result of the complexity of the Agreement and the commitments taken on by its signatories. Consequently, it imposes obligations for different political agents and requires a strong and continuous political dedication. Therefore, the continuous political impulse has been crucial for the implementation of the Agreement and its transposition into the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia and into practice.  Late President Boris Trajkovski, under whose auspices the Agreement was signed, initiated and conducted political consultations with the signatories with regard to the key questions of the Framework Agreement.  Subsequent to the 2002 elections the newly emerged political actor (the Democratic Union for Integration) which accepted the obligations of the Agreement was included in the consultations.  Following the tragic death of President Trajkovski, the newly elected president Branko Crvenkovski, continued the practice of convening highest level political consultations concerning the key issues of the implementation of the Agreement. Upon entering the final phase of the implementation of the Framework Agreement, initiated by President Crvenkovski, a Declaration for Support of the Strategic Interests of the Republic of Macedonia was signed in Ohrid on 10.11.2004. The Declaration confirmed the pledges of the Framework Agreement as a viable model for building and promotion of stable inter-ethnic relations. At the meeting it was agreed to draft a report on the implementation of the Framework Agreement, which would be the basis for further political consultations.  The key responsibility for the concrete measures for the implementation of the Framework Agreement lies with the state institutions of the Republic of Macedonia, particularly its Government and all political actors in the Republic of Macedonia. However, having in mind that the Framework Agreement was signed with the facilitation of the European Union and the United States of America, and furthermore that the international community is interested in its implementation as a guarantee for the stability of the country and the region, information and opinions are regularly exchanged with the representatives of the international community.   The coordination of the coalition partners within the Government proceeds through the regular exercise of Government duties and competencies, in accordance with the legal and procedural norms. If necessary, additional consultations of government coalition partners are conducted, on the level of party presidents and other levels.  With regard to specific articles e.g. principles of the Framework Agreement and aiming at more efficient and accelerated implementation of the Framework Agreement, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia established special bodies for coordination and monitoring of the activities and the achieved specific objectives. The development of a decentralised government (Part 3 of the Agreement), non-discrimination and equitable representation of members of non-majority communities (Part 4), the return of the refugees, rehabilitation and reconstruction (Annex C of the Agreement) are the three focuses of the Framework Agreement for which the Government has formed special coordination bodies. Regarding the point Development of Decentralised Government, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has established a three-tiered institutional mechanism for coordination of the decentralisation process:  - First tier: Working Group. The working group comprises of high ranking civil servants, and their deputies, representatives of all the ministries – 14 in total. The State Secretary of the Ministry of Local Self-government chairs this working group. Its task is the formulation of proposals and initiatives regarding the transfer and management of competencies, the passing of laws determined by the Government Operational Programme for Decentralisation of Power 2003-2004, adopted in February 2003, as well as the general strategy in the process of decentralisation. - Second tier: State Secretaries Group. This group is comprised of the state secretaries of all the ministries and is chaired by the Minister of Local Self-government. Its members are also the Secretary of the Legislative Secretariat, the Head of the Sector for European Integration within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Secretary General of the Association of Local Self-government Units. This group has a dual function: it provides guidelines and advice for the actions in the process of decentralisation, and resolves and harmonises the views on the open issues related to the process of decentralisation. - Third tier: Deputy Prime Minister of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, responsible for the implementation of the Framework Agreement. The Deputy Prime Minister in cooperation with the Minister of Local Self-government presents the above-mentioned views to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  In relation to the point Non-Discrimination and Equitable Representation of Members of Non-Majority Communities the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, established bodies entrusted with coordination and monitoring of the improvement of equitable representation of members of under-represented non-majority communities in the public administration and public enterprises. These are the following: -  Committee of Ministers in charge of monitoring and coordination of the activities aimed at the improvement of equitable representation of members of non-majority communities in the public administration and public enterprises (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 09/03). The Committee is chaired by the Deputy Prime Minister responsible for the implementation of the Framework Agreement and it comprises of the Minister of Justice, Minister of the Interior, Minister of Finance and the Minister of Labour and Social Policy.  - Coordination Body for the Preparation of an Operational Programme for Improvement of Equitable Representation of Members of Non-majority Communities in Public Administration and Public Enterprises (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 9/03, 11/03 and 15/03). The Director of the Civil Servants Agency chairs the Coordination Body, while its members are the Deputy Director of the Civil Servants Agency, the Deputy Secretary General of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and state counsellors from the following 11 ministries: Ministry of Economy, Ministry of Finance, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Local Self-government, Ministry of Transport and Communications, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Education and Science, Ministry of Culture, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and Ministry of Health. Regarding Annex C, i.e. the point on Refugee Return, Rehabilitation and Reconstruction, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has established a Coordination Body which monitors the situation of the internally displaced persons and suggests measures for overcoming the problems related to these persons, until they are returned to their homes. A minister without portfolio chairs the Coordination Body, while its members are civil servants in the Ministry for Transport and Communication, the Ministry of Finance, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, and Ministry of Labour and Social Policy. If required, representatives of other ministries participate in the work of this body.  At its session held on 05.04.2004, the Government reviewed and adopted a Report on Establishment of the Sector for Implementation of the Framework Agreement. Accordingly, the Secretary General of the Government, on 20.04.2004, amended the Rulebook on Internal Organisation of the General Secretariat as a service of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Based on the new provisions of the Rulebook, the Sector for Implementation of the Framework Agreement which is established within the General Secretariat of the Government performs the following tasks: provides administrative support to the Government in the implementation of the strategic priorities related to the obligations stemming from the Framework Agreement, and in particular ensuring equitable representation of members belonging to non-majority communities in the public administration and other public institutions; monitors the process of decentralisation and public administration reform; prepares a methodology for adoption of ction Plans of the Government in the field of implementation of the Framework Agreement; prepares an Action Plan for development and monitoring of projects related to the Framework Agreement and for coordination of its implementation; ensures regular communication, monitors and coordinates the activities for implementation of the projects of the Action Plans with the specific ministries and other state administrative bodies; provides expert advise and analytical reports; coordinates the activities with the state bodies and with external bodies and donors; promotes staffing of required human resources; supports the activities for ensuring the required funds; actively communicates with the public; prepares reports for the Government about the implementation of the Framework Agreement; improves the process of implementation of the Framework Agreement;  co-operates with other sectors of the General Secretariat, gives expert opinion related to the implementation of the Framework Agreement. The following units perform the activities within competence of the Sector for Implementation of the Framework Agreement: Unit for Equitable Representation of the Non-majority Communities; Unit for Coordination and Co-operation; Unit for Monitoring of the Process of Decentralisation and Public Administration Reforms in the Republic of Macedonia related to the Framework Agreement; Unit for Human Resources and Financing; and Unit for Public Relations. 16. What is the current structure of regional and local administration? The Constitution stipulates the right to local self-government as one of the fundamental values of the Constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 8, paragraph 1, line 9).  As prescribed in the Constitution, the local self-government was regulated with the Law on Local Self-government, the Law on Territorial Division of the Republic of Macedonia and Determination of the Areas of Municipalities, the Law on the City of Skopje, and the Law on Local Elections, adopted in 1995 and in 1996. In 1997, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia ratified the European Charter of Local Self-Government thereby endorsing European standards for the organisation of the local self-government. Following the signature of the Framework Agreement and the adoption of the Amendments to the Constitution in 2001, new basis was established for further development of the local self-government, especially with regard to the new and expanded competencies of the municipalities, advanced democratic relations in the decision-making on matters of local importance, the new territorial reorganisation of the local self-government units in the country and fiscal decentralisation .  According to the Amendment XVI of the Constitution, the local self-government is regulated by a law adopted by a two-thirds majority vote of the total number of Representatives in the Assembly, within which there must be a majority of the votes of the total number of members who belong to non-majority communities. The same principle is foreseen for the adoption of the laws on municipal financing, local elections, municipal boundaries and the Law on the City of Skopje. In line with the Framework Agreement provisions, in 2002 a new Law on Local Self-government was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 05/02). The legal framework for the local self-government in the Republic of Macedonia was completed with the adoption in August 2004 of these laws: Law on Territorial Organisation of the Units of Local Self-government in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04), Law on the City of Skopje (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04), Law on Financing of Local Self-Government Units (“Official Gazette of the  Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04).  The Republic of Macedonia has a single-tier system of local self-government.  According to the Law on Local Self-government, units of local self-government are the municipalities and the City of Skopje, as a special unit of local self-government. The municipalities and the City of Skopje as units of local self-government are founded upon criteria established by the Law on Local Self-government. The area, the name, and the seat of these units, as well as the procedure for founding new units of local self-government are determined by the Law on Territorial Organisation of the Units of Local Self-government in the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04). According to this Law, 84 municipalities and the City of Skopje, as a special unit of local self-government, are established. Out of these, 33 municipalities have their seat in a city, 41 in a village and 10 municipalities have a seat in the City of Skopje. In order to execute their competences, the municipalities and the City of Skopje have their own sources of revenues which they manage autonomously. The citizens exercise the right to local self-government directly and through their representatives in the municipal bodies. The bodies of the municipalities and the City of Skopje are the Mayor and the Council. The Mayor of a municipality is the executive of the municipality and is elected every fourth year at general, direct and free elections through secret ballot in accordance with the Law on Local Elections. The Mayor of the City of Skopje is elected in the same manner. The members of the municipal Council are citizen’s representatives elected at general, direct and free elections, by secret ballot and for four years term of office. The election of the members of the Council is regulated by the Law on Local Elections. The number of members in the Council is determined depending on the number of inhabitants in the municipality and cannot be lower than 9 or higher than 33. The Council of the City of Skopje comprises 45 representatives also elected at general, direct and free elections, organised on the territory of the City of Skopje. The municipal Council/ the Council of the City of Skopje elects a president of the Council amongst the ranks of the Council members. The elections for the bodies of the municipalities and the City of Skopje are called and held simultaneously in all the municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia and the City of Skopje. The competence and organisation of the work of the bodies of the local self-government units (the Council and the Mayor) are regulated by the Law on Local Self-government and the statutes of the municipalities/the City of Skopje adopted independently by the municipal councils. In the municipality where at least 20% of the population, as established by the last census, are members of a non-majority community, a Committee for Inter-Community Relations is established, comprising an equal number of representatives of each community represented in that municipality, elected in a manner determined by the statute. The Committee reviews issues pertaining to relations among communities represented in that municipality and gives opinions and proposals for resolution of issues in this area.  Municipal administration is organised for implementation of tasks within the competences of the municipal bodies. The organisation, competencies and the manner of implementation of the duties of the municipal administration are determined by the Council, upon a proposal of the Mayor. For execution of specific competencies, two or more municipalities may establish joint administrative bodies for specific areas in accordance with the Law. The status of the employees in the municipal administration, with exception to those who perform technical and logistical tasks, is equal to the status of those employed in the central civil service. They have a status of civil servants and the provisions of the Law on Civil Servants apply to them, as well (for details see I_C_6). Municipal administration and administration in the public enterprises established by the municipality is recruited taking into consideration the principle of equitable representation of the members of non-majority communities represented in the municipality at all levels of administration, as well as respecting the criteria of expertise and competence. In the area of the municipalities, local neighbourhood communities may be formed for the purpose of  direct participation of the citizens in the decision-making process concerning issues of every day importance for the life and activities of the citizens of that area. As a form of neighbourhood community with a seat in a city, these communities are defined as urban communities, and those with a seat in the villages are defined as local communities.  The mayor of the municipality has a legal authority to delegate the execution of specific matters to the chair of the urban council, or of the local council.  The direct participation of the citizens in the decision-making process concerning questions of local importance can be realised through a civic initiative, citizen’s gathering or referendum, in a manner and in a procedure determined by law. The municipalities, within the framework of the Constitution, the Law on Local Self-government, and in accordance with the subsidiarity principle, have a right to conduct matters of public interest in the areas not excluded from their competencies, or not in a competence of the state administrative bodies.  The municipalities, within the national legal framework, regulate matters of public interest independently and in a manner determined by law; hence, they are responsible for their execution. The competences of the municipality, as a rule, are complete and non-transferable and cannot be taken from them or be limited, except in cases determined by law. The municipalities are responsible for carrying out matters of public interests of the local community in the following areas: urban planning; protection of environment; local economic development; utility services; culture, sports and recreation; social care and child care; education; health care; protection and rescue of citizens and their property from damages of war, natural disasters, and other accidents, as well as protection from the consequences of such events, fire protection and other matters as determined by law. The duties are carried out in accordance with standards and procedures determined by laws regulating the specific areas. These laws also determine the mandatory duties of the municipality. The laws that define the new competencies of the municipalities also identify the sources of financing for the exercise thereof. For the exercise of their competencies, the municipalities establish public services in accordance with law. Two or more municipalities may pool funds and may establish joint public services in order to facilitate the realisation of common interests and activities within the competences of the municipalities.  The state administrative bodies can delegate the execution of specific functions to the mayor in accordance with law. The manner in which these competencies are discharged may be adapted to the local conditions; however, the standards determined by law must be respected.  Certain state administrative bodies (ministries and other) depending on the types of competencies they exercise, within their internal organisation, may organise local offices or other type of organisational entities in the municipalities, having a seat in a city. These offices are responsible to perform duties within the competence of the relevant central administrative bodies for the area of two or more municipalities, within the lines of the municipal boundaries comprising the area.  The municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia are associated in the Association of Local Self–Government Units (ALSGU).  The Government is obliged to consult the municipalities in the procedures of planning and decision-making on issues pertaining to the municipalities, as well as in planning public works, when preparing the Spatial Plan of the state, in a manner determined by a law in the respective area. For coordination in planning, developing programmes and implementation of policies in specific areas or a group of areas, the Government may sign co-operation agreements with one or more municipalities in the areas of joint interest and may make consultations concerning specific questions. 
17. Is there a detailed plan for the transfer of powers to local governments as foreseen by the Framework Agreement? Which powers have been effectively delegated? Please explain how this has been implemented in practice (staff, training, infrastructure, etc.). Regarding the development of decentralised government the Framework Agreement foresees adoption of a revised Law on Local Self-government, which would strengthen the authorities of the elected local representatives and would significantly increase their competences, in accordance with the Constitution. The increased competences concern the following areas: public services, urban and rural planning, environment protection, local economic development, culture, local finances, education, social security and healthcare. In November 2001, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia which created the constitutional basis for development of legislation on the specific competences of the local self-government defined under the Framework Agreement. In January 2002, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Law on Local Self-government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/02), which as an organic law establishes the new local self-government in the Republic of Macedonia and specifies the competencies defined by the Framework Agreement and stipulated in the Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. The transfer of competences including the development of the normative framework, as a first stage of this process, and their actual transfer, as the second stage, is designed and implemented in accordance with the relevant programme documents adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  In February 2003 the Government adopted the Operational Programme on Decentralisation which, in accordance with the specified competencies of the local self-government, identified the activities, the responsible bodies and the time frame.  The Programme envisaged adopting or amending 42 laws governing the areas covered by the Framework Agreement, and regulated by the Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and the Law on Local Self-Government. The enactment of the laws under the Operational Programme for Decentralisation created legislative conditions for the transfer of the competencies to the local level. Thus far, the following laws were adopted:  Culture:    Law Amending the Law on Culture (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03);   Law on Museums (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04);   Law on Memorials, Monuments and Plaques (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04);   Law on Libraries (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04). Sports:   Law Amending the Law on Sports (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04). Defence:   Law Amending the Law on Defence (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/03);   Protection and Rescue Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/04). Education and Science:    Law Amending the Law on Primary Education (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 63/04);   Law Amending the Law on Secondary Education (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 67/04)’ Urbanism and Rural Planning:   Law on Establishment of Names of Streets, Squares and other Infrastructure Facilities (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04);   Law Amending the Law on Public Roads (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 68/04);   The Law on Supply of Drinking Water and Disposal of Waste Waters (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 68/04);   Law on Road Transport (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 68/04).  Local Economic Development:   Law on Catering Industry (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 62/04);   Law on Tourism Industry (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 62/04);   Law on Handicraft Activities (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 62/04);   Law on Trade (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 16/04). Healthcare:   Law Amending the Law on Healthcare (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 10/04);   Law on Protection of Population from Communicable Diseases (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04). Local Financing:   Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04 and 96/04);   Law on Communal Fees (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04);   Law Amending the Law on Administrative Fees (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04);   Law on Property Taxes (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04). Social care and child care:   Law Amending the Social Security Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 65/04);   Law Amending the Law on Child Protection (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 65/04). Environment Protection:   Law on Nature Protection (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 67/04);   Law on Waste Management (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 68/04);   Law on Ambient Air Quality (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 67/04). Fire Protection:   Law on Fire Protection (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 67/04). With a view to complete the regulation of the local self-government system, the following laws under the Operational Programme were also adopted:   Law on Territorial Organisation of the Local Self-Government (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04);   Law on the City of Skopje (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  No. 55/04);   Law Amending the Law on Local Elections (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  No. 12/04 and 52/04). In order to implement the adopted laws and to further coordinate and plan the actual transfer of competences, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a Programme for Implementation of Decentralisation Process 2004-2007 and an Action Plan in November 2004. They specify the activities time - frame and responsible bodies for the actual (effective) transfer of competences, in conformity with the defined legislative framework and the target dates. The Programme for Implementation of the Decentralisation Process 2004-2007 establishes an obligation, until the date for the local elections, within the established system of coordination of the decentralisation process, to develop a Detailed Plan for Transfer of Property, Equipment and Human Resources from the central to the local level. The process of detailed planning of the realistic transfer of competences is in its final stage. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia in January 2005 adopted the draft version of the detailed transfer plan, and by March 2005 it shall adopt the final text of the Plan. The basis for development of the plan for transfer of the property, equipment and human resources are the individual analyses and plans of the ministries for registration and transfer of property, equipment and human resources to the new municipalities that will start functioning after the local elections.  The Plan describes:   Phases - timeframe of transfer;  Number and type of property, assets, equipment and human resources that will be transferred;   Actual number of civil servants that will be transferred;   Necessary funds to transfer to municipalities in order to be able to perform the transferred competencies;Pursuant to the draft versions of the plan, the key transfer of property, equipment, human resources and finances has been envisaged in the following areas:  Education (responsible: Ministry of Education);  A total of 1.016 primary schools and 81 secondary schools will be transferred as well as 3.759 technical staff;   The complete transfer of competences and resources for salaries of teachers and other staff as well as costs for maintenance of transferred facilities shall be finalised by 2007;  Security (responsible: Ministry of the Interior);  Transfer of fire brigades (property, equipment and 751 personnel);  Finances (responsible: Ministry of Finance) transfer will be made of premises and computer equipment as well as of 177 employees working with municipal and financial accounts, management, collection of utility fees and property tax;   Culture (responsible: Ministry of Culture) - 48 institutions (libraries, arts centres, museums, etc) will be transferred to the municipalities, including the transfer of legal rights as well as 577 employees; and  Social and child care – Transfer of: kindergartens, homes for elderly, other social care institutions.  The effective transfer of competences from the central to the local level is established by the provisions of the respective laws governing the issues of transfer of competences. Most of these laws envisage effectuating of the transfer following the local elections, as of 01.07.2005. The basic reason for this is that the current 123 municipalities and the City of Skopje are reorganised into 84 new municipalities and the City of Skopje, which will start functioning as new entities after the local elections. The agglomeration of the municipalities is aimed at creating viable entities, capable to efficiently perform the new and increased competences. A certain type of competencies in specific areas, which does not require transfer of property, equipment and human resources and which essentially does not depend on the size and the current capacities of the municipalities, can already be performed pursuant to the provisions of the respective laws. Those are the following competencies:   Education, healthcare and social care – management of institutions of local importance;     Crafts - determining the working hours of the crafts workshops, depending on the local customs and needs, as of September 2004;   Healthcare – general measures for protection against spreading of communicable diseases, as of mid-October 2004.  A specific area where the transfer of competences has effectively started is culture. In this area, the municipalities have adopted the relevant acts, pursuant to the new Law on Culture, for transfer of the establishment rights of the Cultural Centres of local importance, which are located within their territory. It is planned that the transfer of personnel is done based on a regulation of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon prior registration and allocation of the civil servants from the local units of the ministries, the competences of which are transferred to the local level. The training of the municipal administration is carried out and coordinated in accordance with the Memorandum signed among the Ministry of Local Self-government, the Civil Servants Agency and the Association of Municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia (ALSGU) Training of municipal administration is carried out and coordinated pursuant to the Memorandum signed between the Ministry of Local Self-Government, the Civil Servant Agency and the Association of Municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia. Additionally, a national plan within the Trilateral Committee for Coordination of Training is currently in preparation.Implementation of certain pilot-projects in the areas of finances and of culture is also under way, through which the capacities of the municipalities to exercise their competences are simulated. 18. Please elaborate on the issue of fiscal decentralisation. How has funding been ensured, or is going to be ensured, to enable local governments to fulfil all their responsibilities? Have measures been taken to strengthen the financial management capacity of the municipalities? 1. The fiscal decentralisation in the Republic of Macedonia aims at ensuring financial independence of the municipalities (own revenues which the local self-government units will manage independently) and resource matching the transferred competencies (ensuring proportionate relationship between the sources of revenues and the costs of exercising the competencies).  Fiscal autonomy is provided for the municipalities within the framework of legally established ceilings for taxes, charges and other fees for delivery of public services. In line with Article 6 of the Law on Property Taxes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04), and Article 2 of the Law on Communal Fees (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04), revenues from taxes, charges and other fees present own sources of financing for the municipality. Their level is determined by a decision of the municipal council. Additional revenues of the municipalities are the grants from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia.  The sources of financing are regulated in Articles 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 61/04 and 96/04). Fiscal decentralisation is envisaged to be implemented in two phases in order to establish mechanisms of financing the municipalities that will be transparent and based upon objective criteria and measures. The phase-in approach will be carried out based on the following principles:   Gradual transfer of competencies, in accordance with the capacities of the municipalities to assume these competencies;    Equitable and adequate provision of funds to the end of efficient and smooth exercise of the transferred competences, and    Reduction of the resources in the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and the extra-budgetary funds relating to the functions to be transferred under the competences of the municipalities. The phase-in approach of fiscal decentralisation is regulated by Articles 44, 45 and 46 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-Government Units ("Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia No. 61/2004).  2. Resources for exercising the competences by the municipalities will be provided from own (municipal) sources of revenues, transfers of resources from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and from the budgets of the extra-budgetary funds, as well as by borrowing in accordance with Article 3 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-Government Units. According to Article 4 of this law, own sources of revenues are the following: a)  Local taxes determined by law, the rate of which is determined by the Municipal Council:  Property tax;   Inheritance and gift tax;   Tax on transactions of real estate, and    Other local taxes determined by law.  b) Local fees determined by law, the amount of which is determined by the Municipal Council:  Utility fees;   Administrative fees, and   Other local fees determined by law. c) Local charges determined by law, the amount of which is determined by the Municipal Council or the maximum amount of which is determined by law:   Charge for landscaping construction land;   Charges from utility activities;   Charges for spatial and urban plans, and    Other local charges determined by law. d) Ownership revenues:   Revenues from rent;   Revenues from interest;   Revenues from sale of property, in case when the sale does not disturb public functions and competencies.  e) Revenues from donations; f) Revenues from fines established under special laws in particular areas; g) Revenues from voluntary contributions:  e) Other revenues determined by law. According to Article 5 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units the following are also considered as revenues of the municipalities:   Personal income tax revenues collected in the amount of 3% on earnings originating from salaries of natural persons, collected in the municipality in which the natural persons have their registered dwelling and place of residence and    Personal income tax revenues collected in the amount of 100% on natural persons carrying out craftsmanship, registered pursuant to the Law on Craftsmanship in the area of the municipality where they are registered for performing such activity. Additional revenues in the budget of the municipality for financing its competences, defined by law are provided in the form of grants from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and from the budgets of the extra-budgetary funds, in accordance with Article 8 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units. The grants are allocate as follows:   VAT revenues;  earmarked grants;  capital grants;   block grants; and   grants for delegated competences.  VAT revenues, according to Article 9 of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units (as general grant) are allocated to municipalities according to the Decree on Methodology of Allocation of Revenues from the Value Added Tax adopted annually by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, by 30 of June at the latest in the current year, for the following year. With respect to 2005, the Decree should be adopted two months before the application of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units at the latest, i.e. by 01.05.2005.. At least 50% of the VAT revenues is allocated according to the population criterion and other criteria. The municipality decides independently about the usage of the VAT revenues. The earmarked and capital grants referred to in Articles 10 and 11 are used for specific purposes - investments in accordance with the needs of the municipality and/or the development of the state. The purposes and amounts of these grants are determined in a transparent way through publishing the criteria, procedures and deadlines for allocation of these grants for the following year by the line ministries and extra-budgetary funds, by 30 March of current year at the latest, as stipulated in Article 8, paragraph 4. With respect to the allocation of these grants in 2005, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia will have to adopt Decrees on Methodology of Allocation of Earmarked and Capital Grants, excluding the resources for salaries and wages, two months before the application of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units at the latest, i.e. by 01.05.2005. The block grants referred to in Article 12 are allocated for financing the competencies in the area of culture, social care and childcare, education and health care. The use of the block grants will begin when the conditions for the second phase of the fiscal decentralisation are fulfilled. Thus, the competencies in the areas of culture, social care and childcare, education and health care will be fully financed. The municipalities will receive appropriate amounts of revenues and will manage them independently according to the methodology for establishment of criteria for allocation of block grants, based on a formula that uses appropriate indicators on the needs of each programme. The grant for delegated competences referred to in Article 13 is used for financing specific competences delegated by a state administrative body to the mayor of the municipality. VAT revenues and block grants transferred from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia to the budget of a municipality is carried out in at least 12 instalments, pursuant to Article 17, thus providing timely execution of the functions of the municipalities. It is considered that this system of financing of the municipalities will ensure better collection of the own revenues, the share of which in the total municipal revenue is 33.20%. Furthermore, these revenues are expected to increase in the following period. Additionally, the system of grants should provide smooth execution of the responsibilities of the municipalities, including the financial equalisation that should reduce the disparities in the fiscal capacities of the municipalities. 3. Most of the activities for strengthening the financial management capacities of the municipalities the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of Local Self-Government undertake in cooperation with international donors. To the end of improving the financial and accounting reports, part of the local offices of the Ministry of Finance performing the financial and accounting tasks for the municipalities, are equipped with computers and other IT equipment and office supplies. Funds for this purpose are provided from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia in the amount of 6.000.000 MKD.  At the end of 2002, the Ministry of Finance signed a Memorandum of Cooperation with the municipalities of Veles, Gostivar, Sveti Nikole and Struga for launching pilot projects for improvement of the collection of property taxes and utility fees. The Mayors were given full competences for determining and registering the taxpayers. Thus significant progress was achieved in these municipalities and the revenue collection was increased (property tax by 41.9%, tax on transfer of real estate by 195.0%, inheritance and gift tax by 106.4%, and utility fees by 16.6%).  The main objective of this cooperation was ensuring better recording of taxpayers and greater revenue collection in these municipalities. By improving the IT equipment and preparing software program for collection of the utility fees necessary to be finally tested and approved by the Public Revenue Office and the municipalities, it is believed that the collection of local taxes will definitely improve. In the coming period, it is planned to prepare a software for property taxes, for personal records of taxpayers and for tax accounting, as modules of an integrated system of data processing of the local taxes and fees. During the drafting of the Law on Financing of Local Self-government Units (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04, 96/04), the Law on Property Taxes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04), and the Law on Utility Fees (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/04), significant assistance was provided to the Ministry of Finance by experts from the IMF, USAID under the Local Government Reform Project and the Council of Europe Resident experts and part-time engaged experts for certain issues provided significant support to the working groups in preparing the text of the laws (analysis of laws of the EU Member States and other countries in the region, documents related to acquis communitaire, comparative analyses). Taking into account the amount of arrears of the municipalities, having potentially large influence on the implementation of the decentralisation process, the Ministry of Finance, under the 2003 CARDS Programme, prepared a Report on the Debt of the Municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia in the period May-June 2004. The report identified the amount of the debt and defined guidelines for further activities for settling the arrears.  Continuing activities in the Ministry of Finance aimed at realisation of the project that should propose Plan for Rescheduling, Restructuring and Settlement of the Municipal Debt. The plan is realised with technical assistance by the USAID Macedonia. So far, the types of debt as well as the creditors have been identified and separate financial records for each municipality in terms of arrears have been prepared. Information was submitted to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, together with draft conclusions. Further activities will be carried out under coordination by the Ministry of Finance. At the same time, activities have been undertaken to the end of training the employees in the municipal administration, especially in financial management. Manuals were prepared to the end of efficient financial management of the municipalities, those being: Manual on Financing Local Self-Government Units, Manual on Preparation of Municipal Budgets and Manual on Execution of Municipal Budget, providing detailed instructions to the local civil servants in planning of the political and program directions and guidelines of the local authorities related to financing the competences, pursuant to the laws and regulations.  The advantages of joint administration from the point of view of improved management of the funds and decrease of the costs, as an objective to be met by the municipalities with weaker fiscal capacity, were promoted by a project supported by the Organisation for Cooperation and Security in Europe. The Municipality of Kievo and six other municipalities in that region were taken as a pilot project. The project also included training activities for improved management of the municipal administration throughout the year. To the end of strengthening the capacities of the civil servants in specific ministries and Mayors of some municipalities, study tours and seminars were organised during 2004, and cooperation with other states from the EU and the region was realised in order to get familiar with the systems of these countries (Germany, Austria, Croatia, Serbia and Montenegro). During 2004, more than 600 persons (mayors, employees in the municipal administration, civil society representatives, etc.) participated in the training Management of Available Resources.  On the basis of research, studies, and publications by the UNDP Macedonia in the past two years, financial management capacities of the local and central government were strengthened. The following reports were published: National Report on Human Development 2004 - Macedonia; Decentralisation for Human Development; Socio-economic Disparities Among Municipalities in Macedonia; Data and Indicators for the Municipalities in Macedonia; Profile of a Municipality in Macedonia - Definitions and Sources, Study on the Financial Management of the Municipalities in Macedonia. On the basis of the Report on the Assessment of Measures for Oversight, Financial Control and Supervision Over the Operations of the Municipalities, UNDP Macedonia Project, in co-operation with the Ministry of Local Self-government and the Civil Servants Agency, organised a number of trainings in the period January-March 2003. These trainings were attended by 159 persons, and were aimed at strengthening the capacities of the local authorities by building capacities for financial management and transparency. At the beginning of 2005, a number of donors (World Bank – Municipality Development Project, European Agency for Reconstruction (EAR), OSCE spill-over mission in Skopje, USAID Macedonia) have jointly prepared a coordinated Programme for the development of a plan for training in financial management and reporting in the municipalities, including Train the trainer and training of financial officers.  Manuals have been prepared on laws and regulations with respect to the employees in the municipal administration and with respect to the newly elected officials in the municipal bodies, all that to the end of improving the understanding of this target group of the decision-making process and management of the available resources. Strengthening of the capacities of all participants in the process of fiscal decentralisation is also an aim of the EAR project, financed under the 2004 CARDS Programme, Financial Management and Reporting of the Municipalities, to be conducted in 2005. 19. Which changes have been introduced to the boundaries of the municipalities? The Law on Territorial Organisation of the Local Self-government in the Republic of Macedonia, adopted on 11.08.2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04), provides for the reduction of the number of municipalities from 123 to 84. The changes in the municipal boundaries were done in order to enlarge and consolidate the municipalities in the Republic of Macedonia. With a few exceptions, the enlargement of the municipalities has been mainly carried out by a full merger of two or more municipalities as defined by the former Law on Territorial Organisation. Some settlements from one municipality are adjoined to another municipality due to the better communication links with the new municipal centre. These are the settlements: the village of Kjafa from the municipality of Oslomej (according to the previous Law on Territorial Organisation from 1996) has been merged with the municipality of Gostivar; the villages of Mogore, Osoj and Gari, from the municipality of Mavrovo-Rostuše, merged with the municipality of Debar; Gorno Jabolište, Dolno Jabolište, and Drenovo, from the municipality of Veles, merged with the municipality of aška; the villages of Zubovce, Kleevce, Jaince, Kosmatec, Murgaš, Dovezence, and Beljakovce from the old municipality of Kleevce, merged with the new municipality of Kumanovo, while the villages of Drenok, Alince, Orah, Rugince, Oblavce, Strezovce, and Vojnik, are merged with the municipality of Staro Nagoriane. One of the main parameters for such mergers was the provision of Article 18 of the Law on Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 05/02), which provides that municipal boundaries must not cross the boundaries of the cadastre municipalities.  Under this Law, 41 municipalities ceased to exist, while 2 new municipalities were formed (see Table - List of Transformed Municipalities). The share of the small municipalities (those with up to 5.000 inhabitants) in the total number of municipalities has reduced from 37% to 19%, while the share of municipalities with 20.000 to 50.000 inhabitants has increased from 12% to 20%. At the same time, the share of large municipalities (from 50.000 to 100.000 inhabitants) has increased from 7% to 16%.  The average size of the municipalities has increased from 209 km to 306 km and from 16.443 to 24.078 inhabitants. The biggest municipality, according to the number of inhabitants, is Kumanovo (with 105.484 inhabitants), replacing the formerly biggest municipality of Kisela Voda (within Skopje) which had 125.379 inhabitants and was split into two new municipalities (more detailed information about the 123 municipalities is given in Chapter 21, Section I Territorial Organisation 21_I). The smallest municipality is Vraneštica with 1.322 inhabitants, replacing the previously smallest municipality of Staravina with 316 inhabitants. Following the changes in the municipal boundaries, there are no municipalities with less than 1.000 inhabitants in the Republic of Macedonia. The biggest municipality in terms of territory is Prilep with 1.039 km while the smallest municipality is that of ŠutoOrizari with 6 km. Before the changes of the municipal borders, the biggest municipality according to territory was the municipality of Konopište with 606 km, while the smallest one was Šuto Orizari with 6 km. With the Law on Territorial Organisation of the Local Self-government in the Republic of Macedonia, the former municipalities of Saraj and Kondovo were adjoined to the City of Skopje, forming a new tenth municipality - Saraj within Skopje.  List of Transformed and Changed Municipalities    Table - List of Transformed and Changed Municipalities   

Municipality adjoined with urban  municipality   Municipality adjoined with rural municipality 
Municipality 2004 Municipality  1996 1 Aračinovo 

1  Aračinovo 2 Berovo 

2  Berovo 3 Bitola 

3  Bitola 4 Bistrica 1 Bistrica 
Bistrica 5 Kukurečani 2 Kukurečani 

Kukurečani 6 Capari 3 Capari 
Capari 7 Novaci 

4 Novaci 8 Bač 
1 Bač Bač 9 Staravina 
2 Staravina Staravina 10 Bogdanci 
  5 Bogdanci 11 Star Doran 

6  Dojran 12 Bogovinje 
  7 Bogovinje 13 Kamenjane 
3 Kamenjane 
Kamenjane 14 Brvenica 
  8 Brvenica 15 Valandovo 
  9 Valandovo 16 Veles 

10 Veles 17  Čashka 

11  Čashka  18 Bogomila 
4    Bogomila Bogomila 19 Izvor 
5    Izvor Izvor 20 Vinica 
  12 Vinica 21 Blatec 4  Blatec 

Blatec 22 Vrapčišhe  
  13 Vrapčišhe 23 N.Pološko 

6 N.Pološko 

N.Pološko  24 Gevgelija 
 14 Gevgelija 25 Miravci 5 Miravci 

Miravci 26 Gostivar 
 15 Gostivar 27 G.Banjica 6 G.Banjica 
G.Banjica 28 Srbinovo 7 Srbinovo 
Srbinovo 29 Vrutok 8 Vrutok 
Vrutok 30  Čegrane 9  Čegrane  
Čegrane 31 Debar 
 16 Debar 32 Centar Župa 

17 Centar Župa 33 Delčevo 
 18 Delčevo 34 Demir Hisar 
 19 Demir Hisar 35 Sopotnica 10 Sopotnica 

Sopotnica 36 Demir Kapija 

20 Demir Kapija 37 Dolneni 

21 Dolneni 38 Žitoše 
7 Žitoše 
Žitoše 39 Želino 

22 Želino 40 Ilinden 

23 Ilinden 41 Jegunovce 

24  Jegunovce 42 Vratnica 
8 Vratnica 
Vratnica 43 Kavadarci 

25 Kavadarci 44 Konopšite 11 Konopište 

Konopište 45 Kičevo 

26 Kičevo 46 Vraneštica 

27 Vraneštica 47 Drugovo 

28 Drugovo 48 Zajas 

29 Zajas 49 Oslomej 

30 Oslomej 50 Plasnica 

31 Plasnica 51 Kočani 

32 Kočani 52 Orizari 12 Orizari 
Orizari 53 Zrnovci 

33 Zrnovci 54  Češinovo 

34  Češinovo 55 Obleševo 
9 Obleševo 
Obleševo 56 Kratovo 

35 Kratovo 57 Kr.Palanka 

36 Kr.Palanka 
58 Kruševo 

37 Kruševo 
Municipality 1996 
Municipality adjoined with urban  municipality   Municipality adjoined with rural municipality 

Municipality 2004 59 Mogila 

38  Mogila 60 Dobruševo  10 Dobruševo Dobruševo 61 Kumanovo 

39 Kumanovo 62 Orašec 13  Orašec 

Orašec 63 St.Nagoričane 

40  St.Nagoričane 64 Klečevce 
11 Klečevce 
Klečevce 65 Lipkovo 

41 Lipkovo 66 M.Kamenica 


42 M.Kamenica 67 M.Brod 

43 M.Brod 
68 Samokov 14  Samokov 

Samokov 69 Rostuše 

44 Mavrovo-Rostuše 70 M.Anovi 
12  M.Anovi  M.Anovi  71 Negotino 

45 Negotino 72 Novo Selo 

46 Novo Selo 73 Bosilovo 

47  Bosilovo 74 Ohrid 

48 Ohrid 75 Kosel 15 Kosel 

Kosel 76 Belchishta 

49 Debarca 77 Mešeishta 
13 Mešeišta   Mešeišta 78 Pehčevo 

50 Pehčevo 79 Petrovec 

51 Petrovec 80 Zelenikovo 

52 Zelenikovo 81 Prilep 

53 Prilep 82 Vitolišta 16 Vitolišta 
Vitolišta 83 Topolčani 17 Topolčani  
Topolčani 84 Krivogaštani 

54  Krivogaštani 85 Probištip 

55 Probištip 86 Zletovo 18 Zletovo 

Zletovo 87 Radoviš 

56 Radoviš 88 Podareš 
14 Podareš Podareš 89 Konče 

57 Konče 90    Rankovce 

58   Rankovce 91 Resen 

59 Resen 92 Rosoman 

60 Rosoman 93 Gradsko 

61 Gradsko 94 Sopište 

62 Sopište 95 Studeničani 

63 Studeničani 96 Struga 

64 Struga 97 Velešta 19 Velešta 
Velešta 98 Delogoždi 20 Delogoždi 
Delogoždi 99 Labunište 21 Labunište 
Labunište 100 Lukovo 22 Lukovo 
Lukovo 101 Vevčani 

65 Vevčani 102 Strumica 

66 Strumica 103 Kukliš 23 Kukliš 
Kukliš 104 Murtino 24 Murtino 

Murtino 105 Vasilevo 

67 Vasilevo 106 Sveti Nikole 

68 Sveti Nikole 107 Lozovo 

69 Lozovo 108 Tearce 

70 Tearce 109 Tetovo 

71 Tetovo 110 Šipkovica 25 Šipkovica 
Šipkovica 111 Džhepčišhte 26 Džhepčište  
Džhepčište 112  Čucher Sandevo 

72 Čucher Sandevo 113 Štip 

73 Štip 114 Karbinci 

74 Karbinci 



Municipality in the City of Skopje 115 Saraj 

75 Saraj 
116 Kondovo 27 Kondovo 

Kondovo 
Municipality 1996 
Municipality that adjoins urban municipality   Municipality adjoined with rural municipality 

Municipality 2004 117 Gazi Baba 

76 Gazi Baba 118 Gjorche Petrov 

77 Gjorche Petrov 119 Karpoš 

78 Karpoš 120 Centar 

79 Centar 121 Šuto Orizari 

80 Šuto Orizari 122 Kisela Voda 

81 Kisela Voda 



82 Aerodrom 123  Čair 

83 Čair 



84 Butel 

